Steve Spurrier said he had decided to resign as South Carolina’s coach because the team was heading in the wrong direction. Spurrier said he started seriously thinking about resigning Sunday morning, spoke to Athletic Director Ray Tanner that afternoon and told his team Monday night that he was stepping down, effective immediately. Shawn Elliott is the interim head coach. South Carolina’s president, Harris Pastides, said he asked Spurrier to stay through the season, but Spurrier declined.HARRISON, N.J. — The stadium had been rented, the TV time had been reserved, and the tickets — some of them, at least — had been sold, so the United States went ahead and played its friendly against Costa Rica on Tuesday night. But one got the feeling that skipping it would have been just fine for everyone involved.Three days after an emotional loss to Mexico drained the team’s energy and brought down a hail of criticism on Coach Jurgen Klinsmann and his players, the Americans pushed their way through an uninspired exhibition at a less-than-half-full Red Bull Arena. That they lost the match, 1-0, did not brighten the mood of the team or the announced crowd of 9,214.“It’s not as easy as it looks out there, man,” striker Jozy Altidore said. “Right now, we’re going through a rough patch.”The loss is sure to increase the pressure on Klinsmann, the coach of the United States men since 2011. The Americans have lost five of their last six games, including embarrassing defeats against Panama and Jamaica in the Gold Cup; the Concacaf Cup loss to Mexico over the weekend; and a humbling loss in a friendly against Brazil. On Tuesday, the Americans were shut out for the first time since a loss to Germany at the 2014 World Cup and blanked at home for the first time in nearly three years.Klinsmann, however, dismissed questions — again — about whether the recent defeats should cost him his job. He seemed confident, completely at ease — again — smiling through his news conference after the game and contending that the sky was not, in fact, falling.“There are not only sunny days,” Klinsmann said. “We’ve had a lot of sunshine — 2012, 2013, 2014. Now it’s raining a little bit.”U.S. Soccer’s president, Sunil Gulati, attended Tuesday’s match and would say only that he and Klinsmann had spoken since Saturday’s loss. The Americans are not set to gather again until November, when they open the 2018 World Cup qualifying cycle with matches against St. Vincent and the Grenadines and Trinidad and Tobago.“It’s not part of my character to give up just because we’ve had a couple of bad results,” Klinsmann said. “That sits in your stomach. That drives you even more.”But, he added, “I’m not only the coach in good times; I’m here also to take the team through tough times.”That is what they are. Tuesday was just the latest in a string of frustrating results, starting with an early exit from the Concacaf Gold Cup over the summer and extending to Saturday’s defeat to Mexico at the Rose Bowl, when the Americans absorbed nearly two hours of pressure only to surrender the winning goal minutes from the end.Klinsmann’s lineup had a thrown-together feel. He had released eight players from camp on Sunday and a ninth, Fabian Johnson, on Monday after scolding him about asking to be taken out of the Mexico loss. In came five new faces, but there was little cohesion on display.Any hopes for a more attacking mind-set disappeared with the announcement that Jermaine Jones and Danny Williams, neither of whom is known as particularly creative, would start in central midfield. Altidore and Gyasi Zardes started up front, as they did Saturday, but were again ineffective.The rest of the lineup seemed disconnected. Defenders Geoff Cameron and Brad Evans, the right side of the back line, exchanged angry words after several early miscommunications. Then Jones shouted at Evans after an Evans mistake led to a scrambling tackle — and a yellow card — for Jones.The mood in the half-filled stands was not much better. Klinsmann was booed during pregame introductions, and Brek Shea got the same treatment when he sent a free kick a dozen rows into the stands in the third minute. Zardes heard it after losing the ball over the end line, and Cameron did as well after sending a first-half header directly out of bounds.Everyone got a run — Klinsmann used all six of his substitutes in the second half — but only the Costa Rican players and fans seemed to have any fun, cheering a Joel Campbell goal in the 70th minute and a shutout by goalkeeper Keylor Navas, who had carried the Ticos to the World Cup quarterfinals in Brazil last year.The Americans could only lick their wounds and look ahead to a future that some hope includes a coaching change.“We support him 100 percent,” goalkeeper Tim Howard, who was making his first appearance since ending a yearlong sabbatical, said of Klinsmann. “He’s a big boy, and we’re big boys. We’ll get it right.”U.S. STILL IN CONTENTION Marc Pelosi and Jordan Kiesewetter scored second-half goals, and the United States’ under-23 team beat Canada, 2-0, in Sandy, Utah, to stay alive in Concacaf qualifying for the Olympics next year. With the victory in the third-place game, the Americans advanced to a playoff match against Colombia. (AP)NETHERLANDS FALLS The Netherlands squandered its last chance of reaching the playoffs for next year’s European Championship with a humiliating 3-2 home loss to the 10-man Czech Republic. Its Group A rival Turkey beat visiting Iceland, 1-0, to take an automatic qualifying place as the best third-place finisher.The Dutch will miss the European Championship for the first time since 1984.Kevin De Bruyne and Dries Mertens each scored a goal and provided an assist to help Belgium secure the top spot in Group B and first place in the FIFA rankings with a 3-1 home victory over Israel.With a 1-0 win at Malta and some help from Italy, which beat Norway by 2-1, Croatia qualified for its fourth consecutive European Championship, claiming second place in Group H. (AP)SAN PEDRO, Calif. — The Bottom Scratcher stopped 300 yards off San Nicolas Island on Monday at 5:30 a.m., and Zach Jirkovsky was among those who stirred from his bunk. An environmental engineer, he had been to the island two years before for work, and ever since, he had been thinking about a return trip and about swimming the 70-mile channel back to the Southern California mainland.It was far too great a distance to bridge alone, so he asked his friends from a swim group called the Deep Enders in Ventura, Calif., to take on the challenge as a relay. Most of the Deep Enders were collegiate swimmers once upon a time, and all had serious channel crossings on their résumé.They did not need much persuading.Jirkovsky, 34, and Tamie Stewart, 42, stood on the 63-foot boat’s deck and marveled at the island before they jumped into the water and, escorted by a kayaker, made the easy, 10-minute swim toward dry land. One must receive permission to visit the island because it is a United States Navy base, and Jirkovsky had the O.K.Stewart stayed in water waist deep as Jirkovsky emerged from the sea at Cissy Cove, greeted by three sailors, all armed. Channel swimmers must begin “toes dry,” and Jirkovsky took several steps beyond the tide line to make sure their swim would qualify. Then he placed his goggles over his eyes, jogged back toward the sea and began to swim.The sailors honked their horns and flashed their blue and red lights in salute. The captain of the Bottom Scratcher, sounded her horn too, and the Deep Enders and their support team cheered. If all went according to plan, within 36 hours, they would make open water swimming history.Jirkovsky and Stewart swam back toward the boat, and only Stewart got out. She would be the last of the six-person relay team to swim a shift. Each would swim for an hour before yielding to the next, and for the crossing to officially qualify, the team would have to maintain that order and each athlete would have to spend an hour in the water when the time came. If one of them quit for any reason, the attempt would fail.Jirkovsky kept swimming, following the kayak, which followed the support boat. The current was at his back. After an hour, the team’s leader and coach, Jim McConica, 64, jumped in, the first shift change. By the time John Chung, 45, tapped him out, the Deep Enders were off to a splendid start.By 3 p.m. Monday afternoon, though, the team was fighting current and dealing with a seven-foot swell. The battle peaked 20 miles into the swim as they approached Santa Barbara Island that night.“The island is shaped like an airplane wing,” McConica said, “and the volume of water sweeping around that island was hugely powerful and cut our speed.”Up until then, the swimmers had been averaging 5,200 yards an hour. In the face of that current, McConica still managed 2,600 yards during his hour, but others could barely swim 900 yards.“We were almost at a dead stop,” McConica said. “It was a difficult moment, and the moment lasted about four hours.”It did not help that it was pitch black.“All of us have swum in the middle of the night before, but it had never been quite this dark,” added Stacey Warmuth, 59, who drew the team even with Santa Barbara Island and around its southern point.“There was no moon,” Stewart said, “and the water was moving in every direction. I felt like I was in a washing machine.”With the worst of the swirling current behind them, the team still fought a negative current, wind chop and swell until well after sunrise.With a record heat wave on blast, the air was warm through the night and the water temperature was over 70 degrees almost the entire way, so hypothermia was not an issue, but jellyfish were. Open water swimmers are not permitted to wear wet suits or rash guards on crossings, and all of the swimmers were stung repeatedly. Stewart soon had welts up and down both forearms.There were also two shark sightings. Late Monday afternoon, the team saw a five-foot shark trailing Chung, though it kept its distance. On Tuesday morning, after clearing Catalina, a six-foot shark passed in front of the escort kayak while McConica was swimming. The boat captain asked McConica to swim closer to the boat, and warned his teammates that if the shark drew any nearer, he would have to pull McConica from the water and end their quest.But the shark disappeared, the current turned at midmorning Tuesday, and for the final five hours of the swim, the athletes enjoyed a plus current, their every stroke infused with the momentum of the ocean. Warmuth took the final shift, as the Deep Enders closed in on the Palos Verdes Peninsula.“I was just gliding across the water,” Warmuth said. “It was very fluid, the water was warm and glassy. It was an amazing feeling.”With the Palos Verdes bluffs looming larger with every stroke, the sea became murky as four-foot waves swelled and thrashed the rocky shore. Behind her, her teammates dived into the water and swam to shore in a V formation, symbolizing victory. Warmuth checked the waves, timed it right and let the tide push her onto the rocks, crusted with razor-sharp barnacles, belly first.At 4:52 p.m. Tuesday, 33 hours 37 minutes 26 seconds after the relay began, she took the required three steps clear of the tide line, not far from the Terranea Resort, in Rancho Palos Verdes. Soon her friends joined her on shore. Having navigated seas, swirling with current, thick with jellyfish and as deep as 1,000 feet in some places, they hugged and celebrated, elated and exhausted.“There were so many moments of cooperation and mutual support — when people were fatigued and sleep-deprived, and then still got up to go swim in the ocean at maximum effort,” Tom Bell, 55, a longtime Deep Ender, said. “This is a team of people from the same community who went out and achieved something that’s never been done, and I think that’s very special.”Hosting an international ultimate Frisbee game in a small city like Madison, Wis., was an unexpected event embraced by the Madison Radicals, a pro team that started in 2013 as part of the American Ultimate Disc League. The Buzz Bullets, a world-class ultimate Frisbee team from Japan, competed against the Radicals, who had recently placed second in this year’s A.U.D.L. championship.“I think it’s great for building the community and for showing the rest of the world where ultimate is going,” Tim DeByl, a Radicals co-owner, said of the Aug. 20 game at Breese Stadium.Ultimate is played on a football field, but there are significant differences between ultimate and football. “Ultimate is more of a beautiful game and you can play it super hard and people rarely get injured,” DeByl said, because of the no-contact rules. With seven people on the field from each team at a time, points are gained when a player catches a pass in the opposing team’s end zone.A crowd of 1,155 fans, the Radicals’ second-highest attendance of the year, came to support the first international A.U.D.L. exhibition game, won by the Radicals, 28-21, and were encouraged to bring their own food and drink. “We didn’t have all the bells and whistles, but they still came to support,” a Radicals captain, Pat Shriwise, said. “They took the time to come out on a Thursday night when people have work the next day, and that was really cool and unexpected.”For Andrew Brown, a captain, the most memorable moment of the game came from the fans in the second half when Masahiro Matsuno of the Buzz Bullets scored after jumping over two Radicals defenders.“Even though it’s the opponent scoring on us, they were sort of enamored with their style and cheered just as loudly for his play as they do for us,” he said. “It was cool to see our fans not only enjoying our success, the Radicals, but seeing them do well also.”During parts of four seasons with the Mets, Justin Turner earned a reputation as a plucky, lighthearted utility man who could field adeptly and reach base regularly. Because of his demeanor and clubhouse stature, though, he was often recognized more for his merits as a teammate than for the statistics on the back of his baseball card.So it might have been a curious sight for Mets fans during Game 4 of the National League division series between the Mets and the Dodgers on Tuesday night, when Mets Manager Terry Collins decided to intentionally walk Turner in the fifth inning to pitch to Corey Seager, one of baseball’s best young players. In 301 games as a Met, Turner was intentionally walked three times.The strategy worked, as Seager struck out, but the damage by Turner was already done. He burned the Mets with a two-run, two-out double in the third inning that put the Dodgers ahead, 3-0, in an eventual 3-1 victory.In Los Angeles, where Turner signed after being nontendered by the Mets in December 2013, he has evolved past a cliché. During this playoff series, he has hit .467 and posted a 1.233 on-base plus slugging percentage.Turner has also displayed a penchant for particularly tormenting the Mets’ vaunted young starters, collecting six of his team-high seven hits this series in 11 at-bats against them. His success is not surprising to his former teammates.“When he was with us, I knew he was good,” said Mets pitcher Jon Niese, who played with Turner from 2010 to 2013. “But yeah, now that he got that everyday role over in L.A., you can see how good he really is.”Collins deployed Turner throughout the infield when he played in Queens. His versatility and personality made him one of Collins’s favorite players. Before Game 3 on Monday night, the two met during batting practice, and Turner wrapped his arms around Collins’s shoulder, and they laughed heartily.“He’s a good baseball player,” Collins said. “He always has been. He did a great job while he was here.”Turner also endeared himself to Mets fans by dousing players with whipped cream pies after walk-off wins and using pop songs like Carly Rae Jepsen’s “Call Me Maybe” for his walk-up music. The memories of those idiosyncrasies still resonate: During Monday’s pregame introductions, Turner was the only Dodger not roundly booed.The sentiment did not carry over after his third-inning double against Steven Matz scored Howie Kendrick and Adrian Gonzalez, putting Los Angeles ahead, 3-0. Turner was jeered walking to the plate before Collins elected to walk him in the fifth.Dodgers Manager Don Mattingly penciled Turner into the cleanup spot Tuesday, ignoring his .248 average against left-handers this season, 64 percentage points lower than his average against right-handers, confident in his overall ability to jump-start the Dodgers’ offense.“He’s a guy that hits both sides,” said Mattingly, who later revealed that Turner has played the last two games with a sore knee. “He’s one of our main guys kind of two-through-five there — you look at him to drive in runs, get on base, he gives you good at-bats kind of pretty much against everybody. So, obviously a big part of what we plan to do.”The Mets may regret letting Turner go after the 2013 season, but not everyone in the organization was apparently thrilled with him by the end of his tenure with the team. His release was somewhat surprising, given his popularity. He was due only $800,000 in 2014, but there were reports that the front office was not pleased with a perceived lack of hustle.One former Met still enamored with Turner was Marlon Byrd, who spent part of the 2013 season with the team. Byrd shared hitting strategies with Turner throughout the season, and even after being traded to the Pittsburgh Pirates, he continued mentoring Turner during the winter. For five days a week, Turner tweaked his swing with Byrd. The results have been staggering. Since signing with the Dodgers before the 2014 season, Turner has hit .314 with an .876 O.P.S. during regular-season play and entrenched himself as the club’s starting third baseman.He has also displayed power unforeseen during his time with the Mets, clocking 23 of his career 31 homers while wearing Dodger blue. This season, Turner hit 16 home runs in 126 games, even after missing two weeks because of methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus, or MRSA.“I kind of took a turn for the better offensively when I met Marlon Byrd in 2013,” Turner said during a news conference earlier in the series.His Los Angeles teammates certainly appreciate him. “Honestly, I never thought he’d be this good of a hitter,” said Clayton Kershaw, the Dodgers’ ace and the winning pitcher Tuesday night. “He’s one of the best hitters in the game.”Against the Mets’ best arms, Turner has executed crisply with his new approach. He crowds the plate, sandwiching his feet into the lower right corner of the batter’s box. Despite the deep stance, Turner is still able to attack pitches, getting in front of the ball.“Great guy,” said Niese, who still regularly speaks with Turner, even after he gave up a home run to him on July 24, the day Niese’s son was born. “I couldn’t be happier for him.”This week is all about the end of qualifying for Euro 2016 and the start of a new era at Liverpool (and maybe with the United States national team).It is last-chance time in qualifying for the European championships, where only a few open chairs remain before the music stops. Russia is in with a win or a tie against Montenegro in Moscow on Monday (noon, Eastern time, ESPN2), while Zlatan Ibrahimovic and Sweden — which missed out on the last World Cup — will most likely be facing a playoff after they host Moldova at the same time (Fox Sports 1). Spain and England play later Monday, but they are both in.Tuesday will be a challenging day for fingernails in several countries. Israel shot itself in the foot with a loss to Cyprus on Saturday, but it can still claim a playoff spot with the right result in its game at Belgium (2:45 p.m., FS2) combined with help from the Cypriots, who play third-place Bosnia-Herzegovina. Turkey can claim the playoff spot in Group A with a tie against Iceland, which is in. If the Turks lose, however, the door is open for the Netherlands, the most frustrating national team in the world and one you should consider grumbling about. The Dutch need a Turkey loss, a win over the already qualified Czech Republic (2:45 p.m., ESPN2) and then a two-legged playoff triumph to avoid missing the Euros for the first time since 1984.All the Euro possibilities are here.At first glance, Jürgen Klopp, he of the hipster architect vibe and the technical-area gyrations, would seem an odd fit for Liverpool, but Reds fans were ecstatic when he signed on the dotted line to replace the dour Brendan Rodgers last week. Klopp’s debut match is Saturday at Tottenham (7:45 a.m., NBCSN), and while it is hard to see him fixing all of Liverpool’s problems with the set of players he inherits, it will sure be fun to watch him try.The United States plays Costa Rica on Tuesday night in what was a meaningless friendly but now may take on the feeling of a wake — or a therapy session — after Saturday night’s Concacaf Cup playoff loss against Mexico. Tuesday’s game is listed as a 6:30 p.m. kickoff, but U.S. Soccer officials expect it to start closer to 7, which is where ESPN lists it. Several of the United States players who faced Mexico will miss the game after a roster shuffle on Sunday, but Coach Jurgen Klinsmann will be there — uncomfortably close to the fans in cozy Red Bull Arena. Mexico hosts Panama a bit later Tuesday (10 p.m., Univision) in what will surely be a more, uh, celebratory atmosphere.The former N.B.A. star Lamar Odom was hospitalized after he was found unconscious at a brothel in Nevada, Sheriff Sharon A. Wehrly of Nye County said Tuesday. She said the department got a call that afternoon requesting an ambulance at the Love Ranch in Crystal, about 70 miles outside Las Vegas. Odom was stabilized and taken to a hospital in nearby Pahrump, then to a Las Vegas hospital.Dean Chance, a right-hander for five major league teams whose Cy Young Award-winning year, 1964, ranks among the great season-long performances in the history of the game, died on Sunday at his home in New Pittsburg, Ohio. He was 74.The cause was a heart attack, his son, Brett, said.A loose-limbed — and occasionally loose-lipped — farm boy with a variety of pitches and an unusual delivery that involved turning his back on the hitter until shortly before he released the ball, Chance pitched 11 seasons in the big leagues, twice winning 20 games and enjoying special success against the Yankees, a team he beat 18 times.“Every time I see his name on a lineup card,” Mickey Mantle once told the sportswriter Maury Allen about Chance, “I feel like throwing up.”Chance arrived in the majors in 1961, pitching in five games for the Los Angeles Angels at the tail end of the inaugural season of a franchise later known as the California Angels and now as the Los Angeles Angels of Anaheim. He had mixed success in his first two full seasons, but in 1964 he emerged as dominant.Although his season started slowly — he was beleaguered by a finger blister — he went 15-4 after July 1 and 20-9 over all, including 11 shutouts, five of them in games the Angels won by 1-0. The Yankees, who were American League champions that year, lost only 63 games, four of them to Chance, who shut them out three times; in a fifth game against them, he pitched 14 scoreless innings before a reliever lost the game in the 15th.In 50 innings against the Yankees, he gave up 14 hits and one run — a homer by Mantle — for an earned run average of 0.18. Against the whole league for the whole season, his E.R.A. was 1.65, still the second-best figure in the American League (behind Luis Tiant’s 1.60 in 1968) in more than 70 years.For good measure, Chance also led the league in complete games and innings pitched.At the time, the Cy Young Award was given to the best pitcher in the major leagues — since 1967, the American and National Leagues have each awarded a Cy Young — and at 23, Chance was the youngest pitcher ever to receive it. (In the dual-award era, younger pitchers have won, including Fernando Valenzuela of the Dodgers in 1981 and Dwight Gooden of the Mets in 1985.)Wilmer Dean Chance was born on June 1, 1941, in Wooster, Ohio. His parents, Wilmer Chance and the former Florence Beck, were farmers.A stellar schoolboy athlete, young Dean played on state basketball and baseball championship teams for Northwestern High School in West Salem and reportedly won 51 of 52 decisions as a pitcher, including 18 no-hitters. Originally signed by the Baltimore Orioles, he was chosen by the Washington Senators in the 1960 American League expansion draft, then traded to the Angels.The Angels traded Chance to Minnesota after a subpar season in 1966, and he won 36 games for the Twins over the next two seasons, including 20 in 1967, when he pitched two no-hitters in August (one was a rain-shortened five innings), started the All-Star Game for the American League and won the league’s Comeback Player of the Year Award, given by The Sporting News.He finished his career playing briefly with Cleveland, the Mets and the Detroit Tigers. In all, he won 128 games and lost 115, with a career E.R.A. of 2.92.A marriage, to Judy Larson, ended in divorce. In addition to his son, he is survived by a sister, Janet Connelly, and two granddaughters.Besides his pitching, Chance was a baseball notable for other reasons. For one thing, he may have been the worst hitter ever to play in the big leagues; in 1966 he went 2 for 76, an .026 average, and for his career he hit .066, the lowest figure for any player with at least 300 plate appearances; in 662 official at-bats, he struck out 420 times.He was also known as a good-time Charlie who served as a wingman for one of the game’s legendary night prowlers and ladies’ men, the pitcher Bo Belinsky.After retiring from baseball, Chance worked at a number of jobs, including boxing promoter (he managed the heavyweight Earnie Shavers and was president of the International Boxing Association) and carnival barker.He wasn’t shy. The Angels inducted Chance into the franchise Hall of Fame this year. In his speech, he graciously acknowledged the second baseman Bobby Knoop for making a fielding play that saved his 20th victory in 1964. That was a far cry from the young Dean Chance, who, before the 1965 season, suggested to The Saturday Evening Post that it call its article about him “The Most Exciting Pitcher Since Bobby Feller.”“My God,” he said to The Post, “you could go back further and call your story ‘The Most Exciting Pitcher Since Dizzy Dean.’ ”And he added: “Fifty thousand seen me at the All-Star game last year, and I was the best damn pitcher out there. You could call the story ‘From Rags to Riches.’ Or how’s this? ‘The Greatest Year Ever!’ ”VENTURA, Calif. — Their sensible cars and light pickup trucks rolled into the beach parking lot before dawn Saturday. One by one, eight barefoot swimmers dressed in Speedo racing suits and fleece trench coats emerged from the vehicles, waving to one another, rubbing their eyes, smiling and stretching.The bars and cafes on Seaward Avenue were dark and dormant, and a hairline crescent moon floated above the slumbering motel rooftops and rugged coastal mountains, silhouetted against a sky that was just a few shades more blue than black.Once a week in the winter, and five days a week during summer and fall, a local group called the Deep Enders, an elite corps from the Buenaventura Swim Club, gathers here to swim in the ocean before sunrise. On Saturday, as always, they affixed waterproof lights to the straps of their goggles or to their waistbands — “so they can find our bodies,” Tom Ball, 55, a longtime member, joked as the group assembled on the beach.“It’s just a 20- to 25-minute swim today,” said Jim McConica, 64, the group’s leader and a Southern California swim legend few have heard of outside the Ventura pool, where he and the others train when they are not in the ocean. He gestured toward the large house on the shore, 500 yards down the beach.“We’ll go out to the white house and back,” he said.The Deep Enders’ typical training swim, out to the Ventura pier and back, is more than three miles, which they swim in just over an hour. “We’ve been tapering all week,” said John Chung, 45, another member of the group.Over the space of five days, McConica had clipped the usual distance of 6,000 yards by 1,000 yards each day, hoping to round the team into peak form as it prepared for a 70-mile channel relay crossing from San Nicolas Island to the Palos Verdes peninsula on the California mainland. If the team is successful, it will be a first in open-water swimming.After the swimmers traveled by boat from San Pedro, Calif., on Sunday night, the event began at 7 a.m. Monday. McConica expected it to take 36 hours to complete, which would place mainland landfall just before sunset Tuesday. The swim can be tracked online.Along the way, the six participating swimmers each planned to take one-hour shifts and, according to forecasts, deal with a swell of five to seven feet, enough to make a swimmer seasick. Then there are the island’s native elephant seals and their predators, great white sharks, to consider — not to mention the sheer exhaustion of it all.On Saturday, the group that worked out was made up of five men and three women (including each member of the relay team and its crew chief, Theo Schmeeckle), six of them on the backside of 40 years old and all with serious swims on their résumés, including crossings of 12 to 21 miles from the Channel Islands of California to the mainland.Aside from Ball, a music teacher and martial arts instructor, and Chung, a dentist, the group included an engineer, a schoolteacher and a lifeguard: McConica.Muscular and slim at 6 feet 3 inches and 180 pounds, McConica 12 years ago became the oldest lifeguard to graduate from rookie school in Southern California, earning a spot in his class by blitzing his classmates — almost all of whom were collegiate-level swimmers in their 20s — in the grueling, run-swim tryout when he was 52 years old.With waves thrashing the shoreline on Saturday, the Deep Enders jogged into the surf and swam through the breakers. McConica, the fastest of them all, towed a Gatorade bottle filled with a bit of seawater to create drag so he would not swim too fast for the others. The group members swam shoulder to shoulder because in open-water races, athletes are not allowed to draft. They carved through the water effortlessly, their green and red lights bobbing above a black sea, against a brightening sky.A Group EffortThe crown jewel in what is known as open-water swimming’s Triple Crown is the 21-mile crossing of the English Channel from England to France. The crossing from Catalina, the most famous of Southern California’s offshore islands, to the mainland is considered the second hardest, although the circumnavigation of Manhattan receives more attention.In such sanctioned open-water swims, athletes must have at least one kayaker by their side and a support boat with an independent observer on board approved by whichever record-keeping organization manages that particular channel — in this case, the Santa Barbara Channel Swimming Association.The Deep Enders, who are not sponsored, paid a combined $12,000 out of their own pockets to attempt the San Nicolas crossing and recruited family members to spot them by kayak.No matter the swim, the rules do not vary much. Swimmers are forbidden to wear wet suits or fins, and they are not to be purposefully touched by their support team. When food or drinks are offered, they must be presented on a tray while the swimmer treads water.The easiest of the Channel Island swims is the 12-mile crossing from Anacapa to Ventura. All of the Deep Enders have made that crossing. McConica swam it in 4 hours 38 minutes three years ago, beating a record set three weeks earlier by a college swimmer. He also holds the record for the 19-mile Santa Cruz Island crossing, 8:59, set in 2013. But McConica had a swim career long before he was an open-water god.At the University of Southern California in the early 1970s, he won six N.C.A.A. gold medals, and he once beat Mark Spitz by a body length in the opening leg of a freestyle relay. His team, however, twice finished second to Spitz’s Indiana team and never won a national title. That is one of two major disappointments that haunt and drive McConica still. The other is missing a berth on the 1972 Olympic team by a tenth of a second (although he was part of a 1971 world-record relay team).After college, McConica left the pool and the sport behind. He received a Master of Business Administration degree and bought his father out of the family’s car dealership. But in 1981, with his two young daughters getting a bit older, he found himself watching “ABC’s Wide World of Sports” and feeling, he said, like a bump on a log — that he never fully realized his athletic potential. He knew he had to do something. Ten days later, he swam the Catalina Channel.At the time, McConica had only recently begun swimming with the Buenaventura Swim Club, and he was still a sprinter who had never trained for distance. He finished the crossing in just over nine hours and could not lift his arms over his head for two weeks, he said. A month later, he started training for distance in earnest, and the next year he set the Catalina Channel record when he swam it in 8:27. Five years later, at 37, he swam the English Channel.In recent years, he has had as much fun training with and helping coach the Deep Enders as he has had accomplishing individual goals. The group’s seminal moment came in 2010 when McConica led a relay of six swimmers, the so-called Deep Six, which included Chung and Ball, on a 202-mile open-water course that departed from Ventura and wandered north to Santa Barbara before turning back south to La Jolla Cove in San Diego.For four days and nights, the six athletes traded off, swimming an hour at a time, to bridge the distance. It was the longest relay of its kind in history. The previous record was 78 miles.The Deep Six swim was not easy. The Pacific was unseasonably cold that year, with temperatures as low as 54 degrees. Wet suits were not allowed. Besides, McConica considers the desire for warmth a form of weakness, so he would not wear one anyway. In addition, there was a stiff current, and the swim stretched a day longer than they had hoped, which meant they ran out of food and energy drinks to sustain them.“The group was really positive,” Chung said. “We knew that there would be challenges, but we made an agreement that we would get through this together, and nobody wanted to let their teammates down.”Ball, a former college swimmer who started swimming again in his late 40s after his weight hit 270 pounds and he received a diagnosis of Type 2 diabetes, remembers one particular bit of McConica wisdom that helped on that swim.“Get your mind right,” Ball said. “It’s a simple statement but profoundly true. We’ve endured some pretty unreal conditions when the water is 50-something degrees and you’re miles from shore and it’s pitch black, but to accomplish these things, you need to have the mind-set that I will get this done.”Zach Jirkovsky, 34, who led off the San Nicolas swim Monday morning, said: “He’s like Yoda sometimes. I can hear him in my head.”Setting an ExampleThe swimmers listen, not just because of McConica’s accomplishments but because they have often seen him push himself to the point of vomiting and persevere anyway. In August, he tried to become the oldest person to swim the Catalina Channel, and it was a miserable swim almost from the start.Chung was swimming with him that night (takeoff was after 10 p.m.), and so was Tamie Stewart, 42, a teacher, a single mother and the newest Deep Ender. Three hours after departing Catalina, McConica hit the wall.“Then came the diarrhea and the nausea,” he said. “I couldn’t eat, so there were no breaks. When the sun came out and I could finally see, I kept looking and hoping for a great white to come and put me out of my misery.”No such luck. Instead he turned to each side and saw his teammates swimming alongside him, shoulder to shoulder, and knew he could not let them down.“Mental strength was absolutely critical,” he said.He made it, of course.On Monday, McConica followed Jirkovsky and swam the second leg, followed by Chung; Stacey Warmuth, 59, who won six national masters swim titles this year; Ball; and Stewart.Although the entire team was integral to organizing the attempt, it was Jirkovsky who hatched the idea of a San Nicolas crossing.Beloved by divers, surfers, spear fishermen, hikers and birders, Southern California’s eight Channel Islands run from Long Beach to Point Conception, north of Santa Barbara. Five of them make up a national park; all are home to endemic plant and animal life and are sanctuaries by official designation or by nature for marine mammals.San Nicolas is the farthest from shore and the most shrouded in mystery. The island, a rugged 23 square miles, is featured in a children’s novel, “Island of the Blue Dolphins,” based on the true story of a 19th-century indigenous woman left stranded there for 18 years. The book is commonly taught in Ventura primary schools, Jirkovsky and Stewart said.These days, the island’s rolling hills, virgin coves and sheer cliffs are the domain of both the United States Navy and elephant seals, which are not known for their hospitality and often grow to 16 feet and more than 6,000 pounds.On Sunday night, the plan was for Jirkovsky to swim to shore from the team’s 63-foot support boat, the Bottom Scratcher, which was required by the Navy to remain 300 yards offshore. He would set foot on Cissy Cove at 7 a.m. and then begin swimming toward the mainland at a pace of more than two miles an hour.Swimmers must maintain their order throughout the attempt for it to qualify as an official crossing. If they grow tired, they do not have to swim but must stay in the water for the full hour.Aside from those seals, hazards the team might be encountering include sharks; there has been a recent uptick in sightings and attacks. On Saturday morning, Ball showed off the T-shirt he designed and had printed commemorating the attempt. It included an image of a hammerhead.“Hammerheads are really in right now,” he said. “I mean, they are really in. A friend of mine was bit by one two weeks ago.”But the real obstacle in a channel crossing of this kind tends to be the ocean itself, which can and often does deliver unpredictable swells and currents at any time. On Sunday night, when the group members gathered for dinner at a seafood restaurant at the San Pedro marina before they shoved off, they heard news of a swimmer who had begun a first attempt at a crossing from San Nicolas to Santa Barbara Island the day before. He quit after three hours, physically and mentally spent, and violently ill. The swell and the current were stiffer than he had anticipated and more than he could bear.The swimmers understand how capricious the ocean can be. It can deliver spectacular beauty, through midnight phosphorescence, breaching gray whales or playful dolphins at sunrise. But there is often a dose of pain and a stiff challenge to overcome, too.“The ocean is different every day, and you have to be prepared to be able to deal with whatever it throws at you,” McConica said. “It’s a way different situation out there beyond Catalina, where you aren’t protected by the other Channel Islands. That’s the real open ocean.”If the group is successful, McConica said, all of the sacrifice and suffering will have been more than worth it.“When you accomplish a channel, you have this inner peace, a sense of pride and satisfaction that lasts a long time,” he said. “We just hope the channel gods give us a shot.”Just after 9:30 p.m. Sunday, the Bottom Scratcher shuddered to life, backed out of its slip in the San Pedro marina and headed for the open sea. The night was warm, the wind mild and team morale high. Whatever the channel gods had planned for the Deep Enders was anybody’s guess.New Jersey’s effort to offer legalized sports betting was given new life Wednesday when a federal appeals court agreed to rehear en banc its challenge to prohibit betting on games.It vacated an Aug. 25, 2015, decision by the United States Court of Appeals for the Third Circuit in Philadelphia that upheld a lower-court ruling that had voided state legislation on sports gambling. The judges held then, in a 2-to-1 decision, that New Jersey’s efforts to allow its casinos and racetracks to take bets violated the federal Professional and Amateur Sports Protection Act, or Paspa, which was passed in 1992.“We acknowledge New Jersey’s salutary purpose in attempting to revive its troubled casino and racetrack industries,” the opinion said. “We now turn to the primary question before us: whether the 2014 law violates Paspa. We hold that it does.”But now at least 12 of the 23 judges in the Third District will rehear oral arguments and review supplemental briefs. Judge Marjorie O. Rendell and Judge Maryanne Trump Barry were in the majority of the August opinion, and could not vote on a rehearing. They will participate, however, according to the order issued Wednesday.“This is extraordinarily rare — the judicial equivalent of winning the lottery,” said Daniel Wallach, a sports and gambling lawyer at Becker & Poliakoff in Fort Lauderdale, Fla. “It means that New Jersey’s sports betting hopes are alive and strong and at least six out of the 10 judges who signed the order thought there were some significant issues to readdress.”It was the latest development in a more than three-year battle pitting New Jersey against national sports organizations over the state’s efforts to expand gambling to sports events, and comes at a time when the appetite for sports wagering is high. Lawmakers across the nation have looked to legalized sports betting as an opportunity to shore up sagging state budgets with taxes on a pastime already done illegally by tens of millions of Americans.The booming daily fantasy sports game industry had successfully tried to take advantage of that void until a recent scandal revolving around accusations of “insider trading” and predatory practices by some of its employees caught the attention of Congress and state attorneys.The New York attorney general has opened an inquiry into the prospect that employees of DraftKings and FanDuel won lucrative payouts based on inside information not available to the public. In addition, three class-action suits have been filed so far alleging fraud — the most recent in Louisiana, where the operation of daily fantasy sports is prohibited. Still, the plaintiff, Artem Genchanok, a New Orleans resident, said he paid entry into DraftKings and FanDuel contests and deposited money on its websites.Spokeswomen for DraftKings and FanDuel did not respond to requests for comment.The New York attorney general probe is looking at what internal controls, if any, the companies had in place as well as accusations that employees of the company used proprietary data to win millions of dollars on each other’s websites.Both companies have denied wrongdoing, but acknowledged they had allowed their employees to compete in the games, and many of them won substantial sums of money. Last week, however, they permanently barred their employees from playing daily fantasy sports on any site.Fantasy sports operate under an exemption to the Unlawful Internet Gambling Enforcement Act of 2006, which outlawed online poker and sports betting. While 57 million people in the United States and Canada participated in fantasy sports this year, according to research conducted by Ipsos — a market research company — for the Fantasy Sports Trade Association, it is dwarfed by the sheer scale of illegal gambling, in which $400 billion annually is bet globally, according to law enforcement and gaming industry estimates.The two biggest fantasy operators at the center of the scandal — FanDuel and DraftKings — have each been valued at more than $1 billion. Each has attracted investment from some of the very leagues that have opposed New Jersey’s effort to make sports betting legal. The N.B.A. has a stake in FanDuel, and Major League Baseball and the N.F.L. team owners Robert K. Kraft and Jerry Jones have stakes in DraftKings.Both companies have spent hundreds of millions of dollars on sponsorships with professional teams and on incessant television advertising on most major networks. It has paid off. On Sunday, DraftKings and FanDuel experienced their biggest Sunday of the season, according to SuperLobby, an independent site tracking the industry’s guaranteed prize games. Both operators experienced a season-best number of N.F.L. guaranteed prize pool entries, according to the site, as DraftKings received 4.14 million entries and FanDuel received 3.38 million.“Fears concerning the potential impact of the mainstream media’s negative D.F.S. coverage last week appear unjustified,” David Copeland, the chief executive of SuperLobby, said.Fantasy football analysis for Thursday night’s game between the Atlanta Falcons and the New Orleans Saints. Check back Friday for analysis on Sunday’s games and Monday’s matchup between the Giants and the Philadelphia Eagles.Falcons at Saints8:25 p.m., Eastern time, CBSQuarterback Matt Ryan (ATL) — The Saints have been generous to opposing quarterbacks so far this season, allowing an average of 21.6 fantasy points per game, the third most of any team. They also rank 27th in sacks (7) and 28th in interceptions (2). While this is another plus matchup for Ryan, he is coming off his lowest quarterback rating since Week 2 of last season (55.1) and it was against the lowly Redskins secondary. We would be more excited about Ryan if his top receiver, Julio Jones, was at full strength.Drew Brees (NO) — Brees, who is on a pace to be sacked a career-high 53 times this season, might get a break this week, as the Falcons rank 30th in sacks (6) and 25th against the pass with 292 yards allowed per game. Brees is averaging 24.5 F.P.P.G. in his last two starts and should fare well at home Thursday night.Running Back  Devonta Freeman (ATL) — The Saints yielded 253 yards total yards and two touchdowns to a once struggling Eagles ground game in Week 5. Over all, they are considered the ninth best matchup for fantasy backs. The Falcons have been relying on Freeman to carry the offense amid their passing game struggles, and that could be the case once again with a banged-up receiving corps. Freeman is a top three running back option this week.Mark Ingram/C.J. Spiller (NO) — Atlanta ranks first against the run (78.4 Y.P.G.), but has allowed a league-high nine rushing touchdowns. Ingram is locked in as an RB1 play, while Spiller remains an afterthought in the Saints offense and is looking like waiver wire fodder at this point. Wide Receiver Julio Jones/Leonard Hankerson (ATL) — Hankerson is dealing with some bad ribs but is expected to start. Jones is expected to play but might be on a “pitch count” as he nurses a hamstring injury. If you own Jones, you have to start him, but keep expectations in check. An opposing wideout has managed to reach double-digit fantasy points against New Orleans in four of five contests this season.Brandin Cooks/Willie Snead (NO) — Snead solidified the WR2 role in New Orleans with his 141 yards and one touchdown on a team-high 11 targets against the Eagles last week. Cooks finally showed up with 107 yards and one touchdown. Both are solid WR2 starts against Atlanta’s 25th ranked N.F.L. secondary.KANSAS CITY, Mo. —  When Colby Rasmus left St. Louis, it was with a boot in the backside after having gotten on the wrong side of Tony La Russa. He preferred to ask his father for help with his swing rather than the team’s hitting coach, Mark McGwire.Rasmus was traded from St. Louis to Toronto, and when he left after three and a half years as a free agent, it was with little affection. The country boy who grew up in rural Georgia found it as hard to feel at home north of the border as it was to find a place to park his pickup trucks.When Rasmus signed a one-year, $8 million contract with the Houston Astros last winter, it may not have been a long-term commitment, but he had found a place where he could let his shoulder-length hair down.“I’d say this has been the best place for me,” Rasmus said Tuesday after the Astros worked out in preparation for the deciding game of their American League division series against the Kansas City Royals. “The environment’s been good — a lot of young guys with a lot of life to them, and not a lot of big egos in the room. I just like to play baseball. I don’t like having too many people put their pressure down on me. I just like to play. That’s helped me.”Rasmus, 29, once one of the most promising prospects in baseball, is playing like it in the playoffs.He got the Astros headed in the right direction by clubbing a solo home run off the Yankees’ Masahiro Tanaka in their 3-0 wild-card win at Yankee Stadium last Tuesday, and he has continued to be a menace against the Royals. Rasmus is batting .500 with four home runs, six runs batted in, four runs and six walks (two intentional) in five playoff games.“I love the calmness that’s around Colby right now,” Astros Manager A. J. Hinch said. “He knows exactly what he wants, exactly when he wants it and, if he gets it — we call him Skinny Pop for a reason. He’s got a ton of power.”That Rasmus ended up with the Astros was no accident.Astros General Manager Jeffrey Luhnow, the Cardinals’ former scouting director, made Rasmus his first pick, 28th over all, in his first draft, in 2005.“I always figured if you put Colby in the right environment, with the right manager and the right teammates, that he would flourish,” Luhnow said. “He’s a colorful character, from the South, who dresses a unique way. I think Colby wants to feel able to express himself and be accepted for who he is.”Rasmus speaks in a syrupy slow drawl and is more selective with his words than he is at the plate. His hairstyles have carried a broader range, beginning with his first star turn, as a bleach-blond pitcher who helped Phenix City, Ala., to the championship game of the 1999 Little League World Series. He arrived in St. Louis 10 years later with a buzz cut. He experimented briefly with cornrows in Toronto. Now he wears his brown curly hair down to his shoulders.He is most expressive with his wardrobe, which when he left the clubhouse after Monday’s crushing Game 4 loss included a black circular-brimmed hat, like one worn by the musician Stevie Ray Vaughan. When he wears a long-sleeve shirt, it is invariably buttoned all the way to the neck. Barely a day goes by in the off-season when Ramus, an avid hunter and fisherman, is not dressed in camouflage.“Whatever I see that I like, I wear,” Rasmus said after removing white-framed sunglasses that he wore during the workout. “I’ve always kind of been that way. As people, we should be able to have our own tics and rhythms. If you want to wear that funky-looking hat, then you wear that funky-looking hat. I guess you could say I’m somewhat of a free spirit. I am who I am.”Clubhouses can be a difficult place to maintain that distinctiveness, especially the one that Rasmus walked into in 2009 as a ballyhooed 22-year-old rookie on a team chock-full of veterans, who, like La Russa, had strong ideas about how the game should be played.Rasmus, who now is married and has two young daughters, shared an apartment across the street from Busch Stadium with another free-spirited player, Brendan Ryan. The refrigerator was stocked with boxes of Uncrustables, the packaged crustless sandwiches, and sport drinks. The freezer was full of ice cream bars. The rest of the place was a mess.“He’s a different guy, and I loved that about him,” said Ryan, who was traded to Seattle after the 2010 season. “I don’t think he’s a guy that’s trying to fit in anywhere, but I think things got tougher and tougher in St. Louis, and he felt isolated. I hope the world is starting to see this guy blossom.”Those experiences explain why Rasmus, though he is one of the more experienced Astros, is careful in doling out advice, be it on intricacies of the game or how the team should carry itself after Monday’s crushing loss, in which the Astros blew a four-run lead.“People try to get you to do what they want you to do instead of what you feel is good for you to do,” Rasmus said. “That’s the nature of the beast. For us as baseball players, it’s up to us to decipher what goes into our minds.”Rasmus was the oldest of four boys, including Cory, 27, a pitcher in the Los Angeles Angels system. The boys grew up in a singlewide trailer outside Columbus, Ga., in the southwest part of the state. About all they wanted to do was play baseball, and their father, Tony, coached them through Little League and in high school, where in 2005 they won the state championship and were declared by Baseball America as the top high school team in the country.It was about as far from a major league clubhouse as it was from Manhattan.“I was a rough kid, beating up my brothers and fighting all the time,” Rasmus said. “I grew up in a sheltered home. My dad ruled with an iron fist. We didn’t really live to where other people were able to put their influence on us. It was my dad’s way, and that’s how we lived. So to come into an environment like this where people are jealous and telling you what to do all the time, it was a shock. I didn’t know how to handle it.”Luhnow watched Rasmus play in high school, then spent more time getting to know him when Rasmus went to work out in Memphis. It was an odd pairing — the country boy and the cosmopolitan Luhnow, who grew up in Mexico City, graduated from the Wharton Business School and was hired by the Cardinals with little background in baseball.“Colby was sort of the face of the new methods the Cardinals were using, so he and I became linked whether we liked it or not,” said Luhnow, whose analytics-driven approach has helped turn the Astros around. “When you’re a scouting director and you make your very first pick in the first round, there’s a lot of pressure to have that player make it to the big leagues and not just make it but have an impact. So I definitely felt it.”Knowing Rasmus and knowing why he left St. Louis and was eager to leave Toronto, Luhnow thought he would fit in. Rasmus also listened to offers from others, including Baltimore. He will be a free agent again after this season, and Luhnow acknowledges that Rasmus may be playing himself into a contract above what the Astros would be willing to pay. Asked if he felt that same connection to Luhnow, Rasmus shrugged.“I don’t get that sentimental,” he said. “The best way I could explain it is I wanted to come in this year and play hard for him.”For the second week in a row, the N.F.L. acknowledged an officiating error in a nationally televised game.This time, the problem was twofold: 18 seconds were incorrectly run off the clock late in the fourth quarter Monday night in the Pittsburgh Steelers’ 24-20 victory at San Diego, and none of the game officials noticed it.In a statement emailed Tuesday, the league spokesman Michael Signora said that “an error by the clock operator” after a touchback on a kickoff allowed the extra time to tick away, and “it is the responsibility of the side judge to supervise the timing of the game.”In last week’s Monday night game, a 13-10 home win by Seattle over Detroit, an official missed a late-game call, giving the Seahawks the ball even though one of their defenders had knocked a fumbled ball out of the end zone, which should be a penalty.Despite the error in San Diego, the Steelers drove downfield in time to score the go-ahead points on the final play from scrimmage, a 1-yard run by Le’Veon Bell.DEATH IS RULED ACCIDENTAL The death of the former N.F.L. and Iowa safety Tyler Sash last month was a result of an accidental overdose from mixing two powerful pain medications, and a history of painful injuries was a contributing factor, a medical examiner said.Additional studies will look at whether Sash, 27, had chronic traumatic encephalopathy, a brain disease caused by repetitive trauma that has been found in several former N.F.L. players.Sash, who as a rookie helped the Giants win the Super Bowl in the 2011 season, was found dead at his home in Oskaloosa, Iowa, on Sept. 8.ARIZONA SIGNS FREENEY The Cardinals signed the veteran defensive end and outside linebacker Dwight Freeney, 35, who ranks fifth among active players in sacks, with 111 ½.Bryan Little scored twice and Michael Hutchinson made 40 saves to lead the Winnipeg Jets to a 4-1 victory over the host Rangers on Tuesday night.Nikolaj Ehlers and Mark Stuart each added a goal for Winnipeg, which improved to 3-1-0 in the early season. The victory ended a four-game road trip to begin the season for the Jets.Despite being outshot, 20-8, in the period, the Jets went into the second intermission with a 2-1 lead thanks to Little’s short-handed goal at 18 minutes 49 seconds. Little, whose 52 points were third most on the Jets last season, one-timed a feed from Jacob Trouba.His power play goal at 10:35 of the third period sealed the game for the Jets, who handed the Rangers their first loss of the season.Henrik Lundqvist made 24 saves.Mats Zuccarello scored the Rangers’ lone goal.CANADIENS 3, PENGUINS 2 Tomas Fleischmann finished off an odd-man rush with his first goal of the season early in the third period to lift visiting Montreal to a win over Pittsburgh.Fleischmann scored off a feed from David Desharnais, and Carey Price made it stand up as Montreal improved to 4-0. Max Pacioretty scored twice for the Canadiens. Price finished with 31 saves.Beau Bennett and Kris Letang scored for Pittsburgh, which dropped to 0-3.PREDATORS 3, DEVILS 1  Pekka Rinne made 22 saves, and visiting Nashville ran its season-opening winning streak to three games with a victory over the struggling Devils.Roman Josi scored in the first period on a power play, and Gabriel Bourque and Eric Nystrom added an empty-netter in the closing minutes to help the Predators get off to their best start since 2010-11.The Devils have lost all three if their games, leaving the tandem of General Manager Ray Shero and Coach John Hynes looking for their first wins since taking over in the off-season.SHARKS 5, CAPITALS 0  Martin Jones made 31 saves for his second straight shutout, and visiting San Jose took advantage of Alex Ovechkin’s absence from Washington’s lineup for the win.The Sharks improved to 3-0-0 and have outscored their opponents by 12-1. Jones allowed a goal on the first shot he faced this season, but has blanked opponents for the following 178 minutes 11 seconds.RED WINGS 3, LIGHTNING 1  Henrik Zetterberg had a goal and an assist and Jimmy Howard made 20 saves to help host Detroit beat Tampa Bay.Detroit is now 3-0, while the Lightning fell to 3-1.Ben Bishop made 21 saves for the Lightning.PANTHERS 4, HURRICANES 1  Connor Brickley scored his first N.H.L. goal, Alexsander Barkov gave Florida a two-goal lead 50 seconds later in the third period, and the Panthers beat host Carolina.Nick Bjugstad opened the scoring in the first period, the former Hurricanes forward Jussi Jokinen added an empty-net goal with 1:47 left, and Al Montoya made 25 saves to help Florida improve to 2-1-0.HARRISON, N.J. —  In the wake of Saturday’s bitter loss to the archrival Mexico in the Concacaf Cup playoff, the United States national team lost to Costa Rica, 1-0, on Tuesday night in the final game before the start of World Cup qualifying. It was the United States’ fourth straight loss to a Concacaf opponent.Before the game, the embattled head coach Jurgen Klinsmann said he wanted to see heart and character in his team, but he got neither in a dull and lethargic loss at Red Bull Arena.The small announced crowd of 9,214 heavily supported Costa Rica, which created far more offensive opportunities and played like the better team.After a disappointing Gold Cup campaign, in which the United States finished in fourth place without even facing Mexico, the regional power, the Americans continued their skid in the following months with losses to Brazil, Mexico and now Costa Rica.The loss was particularly troubling because Klinsmann was facing intense criticism from the news media and fans that will now intensify. Against Costa Rica, the United States was never really dangerous or creative. The defense looked out of sync, and the midfield looked out of ideas.Now Klinsmann and the team, which has no momentum, will have to regroup.Next up will be the opening of World Cup qualifying on Nov. 13 against St. Vincent and the Grenadines in St. Louis.Starting LineupTim Howard: Making his first start with the United States team since the 2014 World Cup, where he earned international accolades, Howard had a strong game, making nice saves on Marco Ureña in the fifth minute and on Joel Campbell in the 59th. His best save came again on Ureña in stoppage time to keep the Americans in the game. Rating: 6.0Tim Ream: The St. Louis native nearly scored in the 30th minute when he got on the end of Brek Shea’s free kick. With Ream playing at left back, Costa Rica tried to exploit his side of the field and was often dangerous. Ream was rarely able to get involved offensively but still left the game in the 63rd with the score 0-0. Rating: 5.0Geoff Cameron: The Stoke City defender had a decent half, making no major mistakes, and his distribution out of the back was effective. While only playing 45 minutes after a full 120 on Saturday, Cameron probably did well enough to re-establish himself as an important part of the team. Rating: 6.0Michael Orozco: After a quiet first half, Orozco was beaten badly by Ureña after he misjudged a long ball. Fortunately for Orozco, a Club Tijuana central defender, Ureña’s shot went wide. In the second half, his partnership with Ventura Alvarado was lacking, and Costa Rica had the best chances on the night. He needlessly conceded a dangerous free kick in the 79th minute. Rating: 4.5Brad Evans: Filling in for Fabian Johnson, who was kicked out of camp, Evans was not in sync with his team for most of the night but had a very nice defensive stop in the 43rd minute, then stopped another sure goal in the 77th. Offensively, he did little to help build possession out of the back, but he did play with noticeable heart. 5.0Brek Shea: The Orlando City attacker got the start in the midfield and had a few nice runs, but his final ball was lacking. In what was one of the team’s few offensive chances, Shea hit a nice free kick in the 30th minute that found Ream in the box to force a save on the near post from Keylor Navas. Shea was subbed out in the 72nd having added little. Rating: 4.0Jermaine Jones: Partnered with Danny Williams in central midfield, Jones was given a more free-ranging role. He had a few nice passes but over all was not the creative force the team needed in the midfield and was taken out at halftime. Rating: 4.5Danny Williams: It was a rough night for Williams, who is having a strong season for Reading in England. After a first half when he contributed little, the second half was bad. Williams lost Campbell in the box in the 70th minute for Costa Rica’s goal. Then, in the 72nd, he picked up a yellow card and conceded a dangerous free kick just minutes later. Rating: 4.0DeAndre Yedlin: The Sunderland winger and right back got the start at right midfield as Klinsmann was hoping he would provide some needed speed. Despite Yedlin’s best efforts, Costa Rica took him out of the game. He had one chance in the 60th minute on a great counterattack but lost the ball as he moved into the box. Rating: 4.0Gyasi Zardes: After playing primarily on the wing for the Americans, the Galaxy attacker was moved to forward, where he partnered with Jozy Altidore in a 4-4-2 formation. He was among the team’s more energetic players in his 72 minutes, but that is not saying much. Rating: 5.0Jozy Altidore: Returning to his native New Jersey, Atidore had an uneventful half and looked tired. He had a few nice moments of holdup play but was not part of any meaningful opportunities before leaving the game in the 45th minute. Rating: 4.5SubstitutesVentura Alvarado: The Club American central defender replaced Geoff Cameron at halftime and had an off night as Costa Rica’s offense had many chances in the second half. Most noticeably in the 69th minute, he was caught ball watching, and Costa Rica very nearly scored. Rating: 4.0Bobby Wood: The Union Berlin forward has been known for his late-game dramatics, but he was unable to deliver for this team. He did his best and showed a lot of effort. His linkup play with Zardes in the 55th minute was one of the few times the Americans managed to get into a dangerous position. Rating: 5.5Mix Diskerud: The New York City F.C. midfielder replaced Jones at halftime and added little to the team’s possession or attack in the midfield. Rating: 4.0Jonathan Spector: The Chicago native replaced Ream at left back in the 63rd minute and had a poor outing. Costa Rica continually went down his side, and he was out of position on the winning assist. Rating: 4.0Lee Nguyen: The New England Revolution playmaker played the final 18 minutes and was always looking to provide a spark, but to limited effect. Rating: 5.0Andrew Wooten: As one of the best forwards this season in the 2.Bundesliga, Wooten made his national team debut when he came on in the 72nd minute. However, , Costa Rica was controlling the game, and he never really was involved. Rating: No Rating.As I pulled into the parking lot at Citi Field before Game 3 on Monday, the cheerful attendant extended a greeting as he waved me in. Then he asked if I wanted to hear a dirty joke.Of course not, but, O.K.: What’s the joke?“Chase Utley,” he said.So this was how life would be for the next few hours as Citi Field hosted its first playoff game, and the Mets’ first at home since 2006. Although 48 hours had passed since Utley broke shortstop Ruben Tejada’s right leg while breaking up a double play in Game 2, the memory was fresh at Citi Field.That was the play of Saturday’s game, and it will be the play of the series if the Los Angeles Dodgers advance. Utley was quickly suspended by Joe Torre, Major League Baseball’s chief operations officer, but he is playing as he appeals the two-game suspension. I understand why Torre acted — reacted — so quickly. A player’s leg was broken in a playoff game. Something had to be done.But Utley should not have been suspended. He made a hard baseball play, adhering to the unwritten rules of rough-and-tumble baseball that have guided him throughout his career. His intent was not to hurt an opponent, but to break up a double play. To give his team its best chance to win.Utley even apologized — not for the play, but for the injury.On Monday night, the protracted pregame introductions gave fans an opportunity to blow off steam. They booed every Dodger in sight: trainers, equipment managers, ball boys. But the crowd reserved its most penetrating boos for Utley. Even by New York standards, the vitriol was unnerving.“I told the boys before we came, I said, ‘Listen, it’s going to be a wild one,’­” Dodgers outfielder Carl Crawford said. “Fans are going to be into it. They’re going to be loud. You might hear some things that you might not like. You’re just going to have some thick skin.”Tejada, using a blue cane with orange Mets logos, was cheered as he slowly, dramatically made his way to the first-base line to join his teammates. What the fans might not have noticed was that the Dodgers — Utley included — cheered along with them.Before the game, the Dodgers ace Clayton Kershaw suggested that Torre had been “bullied” into suspending Utley. “I’ve seen slides a lot worse,” he said.Commissioner Rob Manfred, speaking to reporters, brushed off the charge. “The thought of Joe Torre being bullied by anyone,” he said, “I find just to be a little laughable.”Torre and baseball were not bullied as much as they were influenced by the intensity of the response to the Tejada play on social media, and by whispers that the Mets would have their revenge.By virtue of his appeal, Utley was in uniform Monday and could have played. Wisely, Dodgers Manager Don Mattingly kept him in the dugout. “Baseball reasons,” he said, but the reason seemed anything but.The mayor of New York, Bill de Blasio, hadn’t helped things by declaring that Utley was “guilty as sin.” Mattingly played in New York; Torre managed and won championships here. They read the mood and did not like it. Citi Field was a tinderbox, a fuse waiting to be lit.“In today’s society, I don’t think you can take that lightly,” Mattingly said. He said he wanted to make sure Utley “felt comfortable as far as being safe.”Fans are not rational beings sometimes. They know this. Mild-mannered men and women can become crazed venom-spewing spectators once they’re in possession of a ticket.The villain on your team is a hero. The villain on the other team is, well, Chase Utley.Crawford admitted as much, saying: “It’s just one of those things that if it was your team, then you’d be for it; when you’re on the other side, you’re against it.“If it would have been flipped around, we probably would have said it was a dirty play and they would have said it was a fair play.”I was concerned when the Dodgers took an early 3-0 lead. But the Mets rallied right back, calming nerves and turning the night into a 13-7 celebration.At several points after the Mets pulled away, some fans tried to sustain chants of “We want Utley.” But by then, most of the crowd had moved on.They should keep it that way. They may see Utley in Game 4. If the Dodgers force a Game 5, they are likely to see him back in Los Angeles.Utley plays the way he plays and Tejada faces a challenging healing process.Mets fans had their boisterous say Monday.It’s time to move on.Here’s a thought: When the Citi Field faithful serenaded the best pitcher of the last half-dozen years with a mocking “KERRRR-shaw,” “KERRRR-shaw,” it was like walking up to a lioness, peering into her face and repeatedly sticking out your tongue.Your life expectancy is greatly diminished.So Mets fans jeered and chanted with the insistent insanity that is our birthright as New Yorkers. And so Kershaw reared and threw, and reared and threw, and he went through the Mets’ lineup like a man on a mower. At the end of seven innings he had yielded three hits and a single run.The Dodgers won, 3-1, and the series will return to Los Angeles for a final clash on Thursday.For the Mets, the night had the feel of giddy hope colliding with prosaic reality. Terry Collins, the Mets’ manager, played a reasonable gamble and started Steven Matz in hopes of clinching this series. A Long Island lefty, Matz is a fine-looking rookie pitcher, with a rocking-chair motion that calls to mind another butter-smooth Mets lefty, Jon Matlack. Matz possesses multiple pitches and a fastball that hums along at 95 miles per hour.“Right now, we’re saying, ‘Hey, if you can give us five or six innings and limit the damage, you’ve got to like where we’re at,’ ” Collins said before the game.Here’s the problem, however: Matz had all of seven major league starts to his name. And those seven starts had been tucked between nagging injuries and a stint on the disabled list.Matz, who grew up rooting for Mets blue and orange, gives the appearance of being unaffected by all the hoopla. That’s a bit of an illusion. The Mets’ public relations department labored Tuesday to keep writers away from his high school coach and his family, for fear that this start might go wrong.“Yeah, I mean, I get butterflies before every start,” Matz acknowledged.In fact, Matz did more or less what Collins asked, giving a gutsy, workmanlike effort for five innings and surrendering three runs. He froze several fine batters with fastballs on the corners, and dropped a couple of curves on their heads. He also gave up a hit to Kershaw.“He had one bad inning,” Collins said afterward, “but other than that, it’s a very good game.”Unfortunately, the Mets’ bats, with the exception of a belt-high, home run belt by Daniel Murphy, fell silent.To raise the question of Matz’s peach fuzz status is not to imply criticism of him or of Collins. This Mets team is built around a pitching nursery, filled with sometimes obstreperous temperaments and strong arms. (Bartolo Colon takes the role of portly nanny). Three of the top four starting pitchers also have had elbow surgery, and much as it drives fans and a few puffed-chest writers crazy, it’s not good parenting practice to simply push them out on the mound for long, intense pitching jags.“We’re going to have to beat Clayton Kershaw twice,” Collins said before the game. “We’re not overconfident by any stretch.”That’s a good thing for Collins. Because for all of Kershaw’s recent struggles in the playoffs, he did a very reasonable imitation of a top ace on Tuesday night. He took an inning or two to find his touch, and then dealt pitches with ease. By the middle innings, he would get an out and pace back atop the mound like a man who knew exactly what he wanted to do, and to whom.Curtis Granderson, who has had a fine series, came to the plate, and battled off a few terrific fastballs. Then Kershaw dropped a humped-back curve on him, traveling 72 m.p.h., and seemingly dropped into the strike zone from a blimp. Granderson pivoted and walked back to the dugout.“You’re facing a pitcher who, when he’s right, they just don’t get a lot of hits,” Collins said later. “And he was right.”The Mets had their moments, the most entertaining of which was the latest appearance of Colon, the 42-year-old starter. He had tied for the team lead in wins with 14 yet did not make the starting rotation in the playoffs.He gives no appearance that this has bothered him, and in fact has now pitched in three of the four playoff games. The young Mets starters tend to have a floor on their fastballs of about 95 m.p.h., the equivalent of driving a late model BMW sports car.Colon can touch the low 90s but more often tosses an 86-m.p.h. fastball, which is like driving a 1973 Buick with a broken muffler.And yet, in relief, he confounded the Dodgers. Leaning back on his back leg, glove hand resting atop his copious tummy, he would peer in for a sign. And then, with no sense of hurry or worry, he would throw here and there, up in the strike zone and then done.Pop-ups, strikeouts, ground balls. He went on for a while, and then departed placidly, as if to the postgame buffet.Before the game, Collins conducted an entertaining news conference, talking of New York fans and how excitable and passionate they were. And he talked of his batting coach, Kevin Long, noting that the biggest thing he’s brought to the table is that “he’s smaller than me.”He spoke, too, of his team, and its sense of urgency, and maybe more to the point his own. He did a lot of losing his first years in New York, captaining a ship with a threadbare budget and the best talent off-loaded like excess ballast.Now he’s eager. “I’m old. Sense of urgency is right now. ... I don’t have a lot of shots. So it’s pretty big for me.”Tuesday night, the old man and the kid were not enough. Now the Mets return to Los Angeles for a final showdown between the Mets’ ace, Jacob deGrom, and the Dodgers’ other ace, Zack Greinke.Urgency is all that’s left.They will be out there throughout the baseball playoffs, on the pitching mound each day, though they will not be easy to see. They range from about seven to nine centimeters in length. Some are thick, others thin and faded. They tell the story of the modern pitcher.About a quarter of active major league pitchers have had elbow surgery to repair a damaged ulnar collateral ligament. Some have had it multiple times. The operation, known as Tommy John surgery, after the first pitcher to undergo it, leaves players with a crescent-shaped scar inside the elbow.The scar is the physical mark of both the epidemic and an individual player’s history. Each scar, like rings on a stump, reveals the past: which doctor performed the operation, how long ago the player had it and whether he had it more than once.“The funny thing is,” said David Altchek, the Mets’ doctor, “nobody ever sees it except the batter.”The scar, of course, depends partly on the surgeon. Even two members of the same pitching rotation, of about the same age, can have very different scars. The Mets’ two aces, Matt Harvey and Jacob deGrom, were operated on by different surgeons who used different techniques.Dr. James Andrews, the renowned orthopedic surgeon, performed Harvey’s operation using the Modified Jobe technique, a variation on the method used by Dr. Frank Jobe, the surgeon who pioneered the procedure and operated on John. It requires a longer incision, about nine centimeters, because it involves moving the ulnar nerve to reach the damaged ligament and then drilling holes in the bone to graft the new ligament. The surgeon needs extra room to maneuver around the tissue carefully.Altchek performed deGrom’s operation using the Docking technique, a method he developed in the early 1990s as a less invasive, less complex alternative. He makes a shorter incision, only about seven centimeters, because he does not move the nerve. He drills fewer holes in the bone to which the new ligament is docked.Altchek can complete Tommy John surgery in about 30 minutes; Andrews takes about an hour. But the Modified Jobe technique is the only method Andrews will use. Like several other top surgeons, Andrews learned the operation from Jobe. Some of Jobe’s disciples say they still hear his voice in their heads, guiding them through parts of the procedure.“I’ve done it 3,000, 4,000 times,” Andrews said. “You need to do what you’re used to, going through the learning curve, how you handle all the tissue. It doesn’t matter how you do it, as long as you do it the same way. Depends how you were trained.”After those thousands of operations, Andrews has noticed that the length of the scar has reflected the size of the player. As professional baseball players have gotten bigger and stronger, the scars have gotten longer. Andrews needs even more room to maneuver inside the elbow of a power pitcher like Harvey, who is about 6 feet 4 inches and 215 pounds.“On the inside of the arm there, that skin doesn’t scar very nicely,” said Neal ElAttrache, the doctor for the Los Angeles Dodgers. “The skin is a little bit more thin and is under more tension. The scar is not a pretty fine line, no matter how you put the stitches in. It’s just not that pretty of a scar to begin with. The only saving grace is that it’s on the inside of the elbow, which is not immediately visible.”After Jose Fernandez of the Miami Marlins had the operation, he looked at his long, unsightly scar and asked ElAttrache, in jest, “Hey, have you been drinking?”The bigger pitchers who require longer scars also tend to throw harder, which may explain, in part, why the injury is so prevalent. As a pitcher’s velocity climbs, so does the amount of stress on the ligament.“Those are forces you just can’t escape,” ElAttrache said. “There is no ulnar collateral ligament that is strong enough to throw a ball over 90 miles per hour. So the shielding of the ligament with perfect body mechanics and perfect muscle forces all have to be working perfectly. If they’re not, that sudden exposure to that kind of force will tear the ligament.”Some pitchers watch their peers throw and try to guess which ones will tear the ligament: maybe the one with the jerky delivery, or the one with the 100-m.p.h. fastball. Even for doctors, an exercise like that is futile. Major League Baseball has assembled a task force to study the issue, but there is still much that is not known, like what causes the injury, how to prevent it and the best way to handle someone who has had it.The success rate of the operation is higher than Jobe first expected in 1974 — roughly 80 percent now. But a recent study, conducted by a group including ElAttrache and Altchek, examined 235 major league pitchers who had the operation from 1999 to 2014 and found that 13.2 percent of them had to have it a second time.When Josh Johnson, the San Diego Padres’ imposing starter, went in for his second operation, having torn his U.C.L. again, about six and a half years after his first operation, he was told, “Well, that’s a pretty good run for that one.”ElAttrache warns his patients, “If you ruptured the ligament God gave you, you can tear the one we’re going to give you.”Daniel Hudson said he paid little attention to the statistics. Through his rehabilitation, he had no setbacks and was on a pace to return about 12 months after the operation, as expected. Then, during his first official rehab start, his elbow locked up in the second inning. He cried for an hour when he was told he needed to have Tommy John surgery again.The second time a player has the operation, it can take twice as long, and the incision is longer because the surgeon needs room to navigate the scar tissue and nerve again. If the tunnels drilled in the bone from the first procedure are compromised, the surgeon also has to devise a new way of grafting the new ligament.“The first time, it is such a beautiful and elegant operation,” said Christopher Ahmad, the Yankees’ doctor. “The second time, it’s rough and tumble. There’s no ‘I’m going to give you a cosmetic, beautiful scar.’ That’s all out the window. Now it’s all about getting a good ligament reconstruction. We don’t care what it looks like on the outside.”Every pitcher seems to regard his scar differently because experiences with the operation vary greatly. Joba Chamberlain, for one, has changed organizations three times since he had surgery in 2011. He had a smiley face tattooed on his scar as a metaphor. “My scar can never frown,” he said.Shawn Kelley proudly credits his two operations as the reason he is still in the majors. When doctors call asking him to participate in studies, he happily obliges. When he went in for his second operation, he requested that the doctor not harm his scar.“Trace it perfectly,” Kelley told the nurse.When John cocks his arm as if he is going to fire a fastball, the scar on the inside of his left elbow is hardly visible. About 40 years after the incision was made, the scar is a thin white line that curls neatly up his arm.It was the handiwork of Jobe, who operated on John’s elbow, in the same spot, three times. He performed the second operation in 1974, after John blew out his U.C.L. Jobe gave John about a 3 percent chance of pitching again, but only if they tried experimental ligament reconstruction surgery.John went on to pitch for 14 more years in the majors. Curious about his scar, John once asked Jobe why he had used the same incision.“It’s kind of like taking a trip,” Jobe told him, trying to explain as simply as possible. “If you find a good route and there’s good food on the way, you tend to go the same way.”Southern California fired its football coach, Steve Sarkisian, on Monday, one day after Athletic Director Pat Haden announced that Sarkisian would take a leave of absence after he failed to show up for a practice.“After careful consideration of what is in the best interest of the university and our student-athletes, I have made the decision to terminate Steve Sarkisian, effective immediately,” Haden said in a statement.On Sunday afternoon, Haden said in a brief news conference that during a phone call with Sarkisian earlier in the day, “it was very clear” that Sarkisian was “not healthy.” In Monday’s statement, Haden said, “We remain concerned for Steve and hope that it will give him the opportunity to focus on his personal well-being.”While speaking at a pep rally in August, Sarkisian, apparently slurring his words, insulted several of U.S.C.’s opponents and added an expletive to the U.S.C. cheer “Fight On!” He later said his behavior arose from mixing alcohol and medication.At the time, he said he would seek unspecified treatment, and the university announced that alcohol would be banned from the coaches’ locker room. But after it was announced Sunday that he would take a leave of absence, reports emerged that some Trojans assistants believed Sarkisian had not been sober during U.S.C.’s 42-14 win at Arizona State on Sept. 26.Sarkisian was 12-6 at U.S.C. and has an overall head-coaching record of 47-35. The Trojans (3-2, 1-2 Pacific-12) play at No. 14 Notre Dame on Saturday night. Their offensive coordinator, Clay Helton, will serve as the team’s interim head coach.Bartolo Colon has played 18 seasons in major league baseball as one of the game’s most uncannily durable and consistent starting pitchers. He has made 475 regular-season appearances on the mound, and of those, only eight have come in relief.Yet if the folk tale of Colon — a fan favorite for his indifferent physique and imperturbable mien — is to continue and grow this fall, it will do so out of the bullpen, where the Mets are seeking every ounce of help they can get.“He doesn’t care,” Manager Terry Collins said of Colon’s relative inexperience as a reliever. “It doesn’t bother him a lick.”This month the Mets have tied their fortunes to a quartet of electrifyingly precocious starting pitchers. Colon, at 42, happens not to be one of them, and he was moved to the bullpen for the playoffs after starting 31 games for the team during the regular season. At the same time, the Mets’ relief pitchers, aside from closer Jeurys Familia, have struggled of late. Some of them seem worn down.That has unexpectedly enlarged Colon’s role in recent days and made him something of an unforeseen X factor for the Mets, a pitcher who might bridge the gap between the power arms who start and close games for the team.Consider that Collins called on Colon to relieve Noah Syndergaard in a crucial moment on Saturday in Game 2 of the Mets’ division series with the Los Angeles Dodgers. There was one out in the bottom of the seventh inning, with the Mets holding a one-run lead while the Dodgers had runners on first and third. Colon induced a potential double-play ball, precipitating the takeout slide from Chase Utley that resulted in a broken leg for Mets shortstop Ruben Tejada.With a little better luck, Colon would have gotten the Mets out of the inning with their lead intact.In Game 3 on Monday night at Citi Field, Colon lumbered out of the bullpen to pitch two solid innings in relief of Matt Harvey, striking out three and giving up a meaningless solo home run.In Game 4, Colon was called on again.On Tuesday afternoon, before Game 4, Collins was asked if he could send Colon out every night.Looking serious, Collins said, “Probably.”As promised, Colon entered Game 4 in the fifth. He struck out Yasiel Puig with a high, 92-mile-per-hour fastball, coaxed a meek pop-up from A. J. Ellis, and got Andre Ethier to strike out on an awkward checked swing. In the sixth, he induced a soft fly from Clayton Kershaw, and after giving up a weak single, induced a double-play grounder that had him happily clapping his hand into his mitt as he walked off the field.Collins used Colon in relief twice in the final two months of the season. The manager said on Tuesday that Colon approached the Mets’ bullpen coach, Ricky Bones, around that time and said, “I hope Terry knows I don’t mind pitching out of the bullpen.”To observers, whether they are watching on television or from the Mets’ bench, there does not seem to be all that much in the game that Colon is unwilling to do. Fans have taken extra delight in watching him gamely swing for the fences after years of playing in the American League, and in making nifty fielding plays that belie his age and build.“He’s about as relaxed as you can get on a baseball field, and I really think that’s the main reason he’s still playing right now,” said Addison Reed, a right-handed reliever who was traded to the Mets in August. “If he gave up 10 runs in an inning or threw a complete-game shutout, you’d never know. He’s that even-keeled.”Colon’s steady demeanor instills the same calm in his manager and teammates, who always know what to expect from this most unusual of athletes.“Have you seen him?” Collins said Tuesday afternoon in reference to Colon’s two playoff outings. “Both games, he’s come in with a big smile on his face, walking to the mound. I mean, he likes to pitch. He loves to pitch.”Colon’s general reticence around the news media has somewhat concealed his emergence as a mentor to the Mets’ young pitchers. Familia, who was called into action in Game 3 Monday night because the Mets’ bullpen was having trouble closing out the blowout victory, said that Colon and Bones were the two people in the clubhouse whom he most consistently sought out for advice and baseball wisdom.In an interview this season, Familia recalled a moment early in the 2014 season that exemplified the way Colon, behind the scenes, could motivate and encourage him. Familia had toiled through a few mediocre outings in a row when Colon approached him out of the blue.“He came to me and he said, ‘Are you scared to pitch?’ ” Familia said. “I said, ‘No, I’m not scared to pitch.’ He said, ‘If you’re scared, take your bat and go home.’ The way he said it motivated me to do my job.”Familia added, “That’s something I’m never going to forget.”Yoenis Cespedes stood near the batter’s box for a moment, holding his bat, watching the fastball he had crushed into the second deck of the left-field stands. He took a few steps, flipped his bat high into the air and rounded the bases. The theme song from “The Natural” pumped through Citi Field, fireworks exploded, and Mets fans hugged one another, screaming.The three-run homer essentially ended Game 3 of this National League division series in the fourth inning on Monday night. From there, the Mets cruised to a 13-7 win over the Los Angeles Dodgers to take a two-games-to-one lead in the best-of-five series. Cespedes’s home run was estimated to have traveled 431 feet.Mets fans could not help rubbing it in. Not long after Cespedes crossed home plate, they chanted: “We want Ut-ley! We want Ut-ley!”It was the baseball equivalent of a crowd cheering for a bull to gore a matador. In Game 2 on Saturday, the Dodgers’ Chase Utley had broken Ruben Tejada’s right leg on a violent slide into second base, a play that proved critical in the Mets’ losing the game. Utley apologized, but it was clear that neither the Mets nor their fans would forget the play for the rest of the series.This win was, for one game, the Mets’ way of exacting revenge.“I don’t know if we could be any more satisfied,” Daniel Murphy said, grinning mischievously.When Game 3 started, the Mets and their fans were seething. As Utley stretched in pregame warm-ups, a horde of cameras followed his every move. During the player introductions, the fans booed Utley louder than anyone else, yelled profanity and made obscene gestures in his direction.Major League Baseball had suspended Utley for two games, but he was allowed to play while he was appealing the decision, and the Dodgers had the right to use him off the bench.That added intrigue to what already promised to be an exciting night, the first playoff game at Citi Field. The Mets owner Fred Wilpon made a rare appearance during batting practice. Rusty Staub threw out the ceremonial first pitch. The largest Mets crowd in the park’s history, an announced 44,276, settled in, many fans waving orange towels.Everyone was curious: Would Matt Harvey plunk a Dodger as retribution? He had created a persona for himself as the Mets’ stopper, their ace. Even his superhero nickname, the Dark Knight, suggested that he would come to Tejada’s defense.But Manager Terry Collins had specifically instructed Harvey not to throw at anyone because, with the series tied at one game apiece, the Mets could not risk his being ejected. Commissioner Rob Manfred also met with both teams’ managers and general managers before the game, Collins said, to make sure nobody got “too carried away.”“Ruben knows we miss him,” Collins said. “He knows we’re irate about what happened. But there’s a lot at stake here, and we cannot just give a game away to assure Ruben we’re going to back him up. He knows what we would do. We’ve done it several times this year, for everybody. But right now, this is a little different circumstance. When Matt Harvey gets ejected in the second inning tonight, we’re in trouble.”Harvey had a hard time getting the Dodgers out, anyway. In the second, he allowed four consecutive singles, three off his fastball. When Yasmani Grandal, the Dodgers’ slumping catcher, ripped the fourth single, two runs scored, and a third run scored as Curtis Granderson made a wild throw to third base. A fourth run would have scored that inning, too, if David Wright had not made a spectacular leaping catch for the third out.Entering the game, Harvey had thrown 1891/3 innings, the most of his major league career, all while coming back from Tommy John surgery. At times this season, the Mets had noticed that his fastball lacked the same bite and that his command looked off. They attributed it to fatigue, and Harvey seemed to have the same symptoms Monday: He allowed three runs and seven hits, issued two walks and lasted only five innings, on 97 pitches.The park sounded as quiet as a library after the Dodgers took a 3-0 lead.It was fair to wonder if Utley’s slide had rattled the Mets. Immediately after Game 2, they called Utley’s slide a tackle and made pleas for safer rules. Even the veterans looked shaken.But on Monday, the Mets declared they would use Tejada’s injury as a rallying point. During pregame introductions, he walked out in uniform, wearing a walking boot and using a crutch, and received one of the louder ovations, a hero’s welcome. He tipped his cap, took his place in line and raised a closed fist as the crowd kept cheering wildly.“That was really special,” shortstop Wilmer Flores said. “Kind of got me going a little bit, the ovation. It got me emotional. I didn’t cry, but it got me emotional.”Once the Mets fell behind, their offense erupted, for 10 runs over the next three innings. Cespedes started the rally, legging out an infield single. Then Granderson smacked a three-run double, Travis d’Arnaud clubbed a two-run homer, and Cespedes capped the fun with that emphatic three-run homer.With the game all but decided, no one was beaned, and no fight broke out. Mets fans did not seem to care that their team still had to beat Clayton Kershaw in Game 4, or possibly Zack Greinke in a Game 5, to win the series. As the game wore on, every so often, the crowd continued its chant, calling for Utley. But still, he remained on the Dodgers’ bench.“We want Ut-ley!” the crowd sang anyway. “We want Ut-ley!”With bye weeks upon us, finding good fill-in players is imperative. But the rampant injuries that have overtaken the N.F.L. (and taken out some of the better fantasy players) have complicated matters.Injuries, however, can provide fantasy football owners with opportunity. And while fantasy team owners of Jamaal Charles, who tore the anterior cruciate ligament in his right knee on Sunday, may be cursing me for saying that, there are some new waiver wire names that are ripe for the plucking. With that, we wish Charles a speedy recovery and move on to Week 6 waiver wire picks.Teddy Bridgewater, Minnesota Vikings (44 percent) — Week 6 is very generous for QB bye weeks, as Brandon Weeden, Derek Carr, Jameis Winston and Nick Foles are off. With Peyton Manning struggling and guys like Russell Wilson and Cam Newton having tough matchups, Bridgewater could be a solid streaming option in Week 6 against a Chiefs defense that is allowing an average of 2.8 touchdowns per game to opposing quarterbacks this season, easily the most in the N.F.L. Kansas City is also allowing 28 fantasy points per game to signal callers, which is also the most in football. Bridgewater has not been great this year, but mainly because his team has not asked him to be. The way you beat this Chiefs defense is through the air, and Bridgewater is more than capable of exploiting this elite matchup. And with more bye weeks looming, and Bridgewater having had his, he gets the Lions and the Bears after this week, so there will be two more solid opportunities to start him.Charcandrick West, Kansas City Chiefs (11 percent) — With the injury to Charles, someone has to try to fill the void. Enter West, who continues to play more than Knile Davis. West showed flashes of promise in the preseason, and when Charles went down Sunday, he had eight touches to Davis’s two. The coaching staff says the players will split the workload, which makes sense, considering one player probably cannot replace one of the best running backs in the N.F.L. But I think West will get the goal line work for Kansas City and the immediate nod at the starting gig, especially when you consider that Davis played the same number of N.F.L. snaps in Weeks 2 and 3 as I did — zero. Both players could be added in many leagues because Davis has that rare combination of size and speed. But if I could pick only one, it would be West.Thomas Rawls, Seattle Seahawks (47 percent) — Entering Week 5, no one had scored a rushing touchdown against the Cincinnati Bengals this season. After Rawls bounced outside and trucked through a weak Reggie Nelson tackle, that changed. It was an impressive 69-yard touchdown scamper from Rawls, who got another start for the injured Marshawn Lynch, who is nursing a bum hamstring. Rawls finished with 169 yards on 23 carries against one of the best defensive units in football. The undrafted rookie free agent looked great, and if this is the moment when Lynch’s workload is catching up to him, we may continue to see Rawls get some opportunities. If you own Lynch and have yet to grab Rawls, you messed up, but he is still out there in about half the leagues.Javorius Allen, Baltimore Ravens (1 percent) — This is purely a speculation add, but Justin Forsett left late in the fourth quarter Sunday, injuring his ankle. He walked off the field under his own power, but did not return. If Forsett cannot play, Allen would be a very interesting option for Week 6 against the 49ers’ depleted defense. Allen was getting a handful of red zone and goal line work when Forsett was in the game, and he had an impressive 44-yard run Sunday. Keep an eye on Forsett’s practice status over the week, but hopefully his ankle will be good enough to play on.Brandon LaFell, New England Patriots (28 percent) — Now is the time to check your waiver wire and try to stash LaFell. His recovery is on schedule and he is eligible to return to the Patriots in Week 7. LaFell was seen working out on the field before Sunday’s game against the Cowboys, and since New England had its bye, LaFell could be a WR3 for the rest of the season in this Patriots offense, which ranks fifth in the N.F.L. in pass attempts per game (40) and sixth in passing play percentage (64.5). Last season, LaFell emerged alongside Tom Brady, posting five games of double-digit targets, as well as eight games with at least eight targets. He scored seven touchdowns last season, including two in the postseason. It was easily the best season of his career, and he looked like a good fit in the New England offense.Tavon Austin, St. Louis Rams (48 percent) — I don’t know what to do with Austin, but he keeps scoring touchdowns. He scored again Sunday, giving him three over his last two outings. I wish the Rams’ offense was more trustworthy, but with Todd Gurley emerging, maybe they become more consistent, giving Austin more opportunity. The Rams keep finding ways to get him the football in space; he has carried 13 times this season. I advise getting Austin if you are in a deeper league or in dire need of help at wide receiver, but we know Austin is a talented playmaker. Perhaps this is the year. If I have roster space, I would be willing to take a chance and see.Willie Snead, New Orleans Saints (43 percent) — Snead keeps making plays. He led the Saints in receiving again in Week 5, hauling in 6 of 11 targets for 141 yards, and Drew Brees loves looking his way on third down: Nearly half of his total receptions this season have come in such instances. And 66 percent of his receptions Sunday were third-down conversions, so we know Brees is going to keep looking his way. He has now caught at least five passes in three consecutive contests, as he continues to play more snaps than Brandon Coleman and Marques Colston. Right now, Snead is a borderline must own in all leagues, especially when you consider how bad the Saints are and that the passing volume should remain throughout the season.Gary Barnidge, Cleveland Browns (51 percent) — It is time to take Barnidge seriously. After making one of the most ridiculous touchdown catches fans will see, Barnidge has found the end zone in three straight games, accumulating over 100 yards in two of those contests. He has been targeted 26 times in that span, and the Browns continue to throw the football a lot. Considering that you’re basically streaming if you do not have Rob Gronkowski, Greg Olsen or Travis Kelce, Barnidge needs to be owned in all formats.Dave Dombrowski, Boston’s new president for baseball operations, said the Red Sox were committed to playing Hanley Ramirez, a shortstop-turned-outfielder, at first base next year.When the Dodgers were introduced before Game 3 of their National League division series against the Mets, the camera lingered on Chase Utley longer than his Los Angeles teammates, as a loud, furious chorus of boos washed over him. Utley, the former Philadelphia Phillie and longtime Mets nemesis, stood there, wearing a blank expression.“He played in Philly,” Manager Don Mattingly said Tuesday. “You play in Philly, I mean, this is the same. Right? I think he was fine.”Utley became a villain after he broke Ruben Tejada’s right leg with a violent slide in Game 2 on Saturday. Major League Baseball suspended Utley for two games, but Utley appealed the ruling and he was allowed to play. He will be available to play the rest of the series because his appeal hearing is not scheduled until Monday, according to two people with knowledge of the situation.Utley did not play in Game 2, but Mattingly did not rule out using him in Game 4 or a possible Game 5. The Mets alternatively did not seem fazed by the news that Utley would be available. Instead of retaliating for Tejada’s injury, they seemed to have been unified by it, and they won Game 3, 13-7, sending an emphatic message.“The fact that they felt the play was unnecessary and they did what they did was enough,” Manager Terry Collins said Tuesday, referring to the league’s ruling that Utley’s slide was illegal. “It was enough for us. And now we’ve moved past it and you’ve got to get ready to play.”FIGHT INJURES FAN A fight at Dodger Stadium after Game 1 on Friday night left one fan in critical condition, the Los Angeles police confirmed.“An argument between two fans escalated to the point of a physical confrontation, and it left one injured,” said Officer Ricardo Hernandez, a spokesman for the Los Angeles Police Department, which is investigating the fight.The victim, who was not named, was identified as a Mets fan on social media and taken to a hospital. He was in serious but stable condition Tuesday.The fight comes four years after the brutal beating of another opposing fan, Bryan Stow, in the parking lot outside Dodger Stadium on opening day of 2011. Stow, a San Francisco Giants fan and father of two, was beaten in a coma and sustained permanent brain damage.Since then, security of the stadium has undergone a major overhaul, with many more Los Angeles police officers on duty. No weapons were used in the altercation on Friday, and a mother and son were suspected, Hernandez said. Detectives were expecting to speak to the victim. IAN LOVETTThe curveball came out of Clayton Kershaw’s hand and dropped so far and at such an angle that David Wright did not even try to swing at it. He kept his bat on his shoulder and stood in the batter’s box for a moment as A. J. Ellis, the Los Angeles Dodgers’ catcher, threw to third base before Wright could even fully grasp that he had struck out.The way Wright described the pitch later, swinging would not have made much difference.“The only one that you can even hit starts at your eyes,” he said, “and as a hitter, if you get a ball that starts at your eyes, you almost give up on it, and then the bottom falls out of it.“I think it was a strike.”Kershaw had not been able to command that pitch, his signature looping curveball, as well during a loss in Game 1 of this National League division series. But in Game 4, pitching on three days’ rest, Kershaw used it to turn in a performance that saved the Dodgers’ season and ripped momentum from the Mets, allowing just one run over seven innings, compiling eight strikeouts and leading the Dodgers to a 3-1 win.The series now comes down to a winner-take-all Game 5 on Thursday in Los Angeles, with the Dodgers’ second ace, Zack Greinke, set to pitch. The Mets’ best hope may be Jacob deGrom, their lone All-Star, who pitched seven scoreless innings in Game 1 that showed he was capable of pitching as well as Kershaw did Tuesday.Even for a pitcher of Kershaw’s caliber, one with three Cy Young Awards and a Most Valuable Player Award to his name, there was some curiosity about how he would pitch on short rest. When Kershaw started on three days’ rest in a division series against the St. Louis Cardinals last year, he allowed a three-run homer that effectively ended the Dodgers’ season.On Tuesday, the Citi Field crowd tried to intimidate him, chanting: “Ker-shaw! Ker-shaw!” But Kershaw looked undeterred. After walking Wright on six pitches in the first inning, he retired nine batters in order. Lucas Duda looked baffled as he swung through one fastball, and Kershaw froze Wilmer Flores with another.Earlier in the series, Greinke had been asked what he learned from playing with Kershaw. Greinke revealed that once Kershaw figured out which pitch sequence worked against a batter, he could return to that sequence throughout the game. Instead of trying to fool hitters or strategize against them, Kershaw focuses more on making his pitches as sharp as possible.“If your pitches are that good,” Greinke said, “they can’t do anything with them.”When the Mets beat Kershaw in Game 1, their strategy had been to grind out at-bats, drive up Kershaw’s pitch count and chase him as early as possible. That required the Mets to make contact with Kershaw’s pitches, though, and this time, that seemed like an impossible task.“You know, we tried,” Mets catcher Travis d’Arnaud said. “He was just executing all his pitches. He was painting all the corners. And when he did make a mistake, we were late.”Just as in Game 1, Daniel Murphy gave the Mets their first run with a solo homer in the fourth inning. But Kershaw responded by striking out six batters from the fourth inning to the sixth: two on sliders and four on his signature looping curveball. On two occasions, after particularly nasty strikeouts to end innings, Ellis, the Dodgers’ catcher, started for the dugout before the Mets’ batter had moved.“You go up there and look for fastball, slider, and he throws a curveball,” Wright said. “Good luck next time.”Kershaw even collected the Dodgers’ first hit off Steven Matz, punching a hard single into left field.While Kershaw was pitching on short rest, Matz, a Mets rookie who had been nursing a back injury, had perhaps been resting too much. This was his first start in 19 days.The pressure on Matz was immense. He was making his seventh career start and his postseason debut against Kershaw, in a possible series-clinching game. A lifelong Mets fan who grew up on Long Island, Matz also had several friends and relatives in the stands.Matz looked poised, too, until Kershaw’s single ignited a rally in the third inning. Howie Kendrick hit a two-out single, Adrian Gonzalez drove in a run with a bloop single, and Justin Turner, a former Met, roped a double down the left-field line to score two more.The Dodgers chased Matz after five innings, after he had thrown only 85 pitches.“I had one bad inning,” Matz said. “Made a couple of bad pitches.”The Mets had decided against using deGrom on short rest. On Monday, Kershaw had asked Mets Manager Terry Collins if deGrom would be starting Game 4, and when Collins told him no, Kershaw remarked that deGrom had thrown a lot of pitches during Game 1 — 121, to be exact.“Yeah, so did you,” Collins told Kershaw, “but you’re making $300 million.”On Tuesday, Kershaw looked strong through the seventh, the inning that doomed him in last year’s series. Yoenis Cespedes led off the inning for the Mets and reached on an infield single as a slow roller ricocheted off the edge of Kershaw’s glove. But Kershaw retired the next three batters — Travis d’Arnaud, Duda, and Flores — on just six pitches. Flores, at least, hit a hard ground ball, but Turner made a nifty grab at third base for the third out.After Kershaw left the game, the Dodgers had their first sign of trouble, and Manager Don Mattingly turned to Kenley Jansen, his closer, to get four outs. After he closed out the ninth inning, Jansen clenched his fist and hugged Ellis, and the Mets fans quietly filed out of the park, having seen what might prove the team’s last home game of the year.Weeks before a leak of inside information led state investigators to question whether daily fantasy football games were a fraud, misleading thousands of players vying for millions of dollars in prize money, Madison Calvert, a regular player, became suspicious.At a private party for DraftKings, one of the biggest daily fantasy websites, Calvert said, he discussed his baseball contest choices with a host, Jon Aguiar, an executive of the site, who suddenly made a quick check on his phone and, to Calvert’s surprise, informed him that his pick of a pitcher was a poor choice because many other players had selected him.“I shouldn’t have pulled that up in front of you, ha-ha,” Calvert said Aguiar told him.That was days after Calvert, 29, had repeatedly been challenged for head-to-head play in another game, on the website FanDuel, by a Rick Sawyer. After checking a search engine, Calvert said, he found that Sawyer was actually a business planning manager at DraftKings.“I could only think that he had watched my DraftKings account and had me pegged as a suboptimal player,” Calvert said. “I felt like a moron.”Calvert said it was “pretty obvious that with insider information and access to top players,” players like him would not have a chance in the long run.Calvert is not the only one raising doubts about the clubby, cozy connections between the two companies at the head of the booming, unregulated, multibillion-dollar daily fantasy industry, in which players pay a fee on a website, assemble virtual rosters of players and then, in pursuit of jackpots ranging from $22 to $2 million, score points based on the real-world outcomes of professional games.The New York State attorney general’s office began an inquiry last week into whether employees of DraftKings or FanDuel had used inside information to prey on customers on each other’s sites, and a class-action lawsuit was filed in federal court in New York on Thursday, alleging fraud. Lawmakers and analysts are also calling for some form of regulation for an industry that has had explosive growth in the last few years.Representative Dina Titus, Democrat of Nevada, wants Congress to re-examine the Unlawful Internet Gambling Enforcement Act of 2006, which deemed the games legal. Titus told the House Committee on Energy and Commerce in a letter that it was critical for Congress to “investigate this growing industry.”But records and interviews show a long-held pattern of overlapping interests and close relationships among employees at the companies — many of whom regularly rank among the most consistent big winners — and in some cases investors, which include Major League Baseball, the N.B.A. and two N.F.L. owners, as well as media giants like NBC, its parent Comcast and Fox.Andre Bessette, a manger of analytics at DraftKings, is currently ranked No. 40 and won a $50,000 first prize in a FanDuel contest, the 2015 World Fantasy Hockey Championship.Matthew Boccio, who sets player prices at FanDuel, is among the highest-ranked of all fantasy players, according to the website RotoGrinders, and was awarded $50,000 in June for winning DraftKings’ King of Boston contest. Soon after, he was the subject of an article on FanDuel titled “Look Inside the Belly of a DFS Whale,” in which he shared tips, including avoiding players like himself.Employees BarredBoth companies have announced that they have permanently barred their employees from competing in daily fantasy sports and have brought in high-profile former federal prosecutors to conduct an independent investigation. ESPN dropped segments sponsored by daily fantasy sites.DraftKings, which issued a statement Friday seeking to reassure fans about the integrity of the game, declined to make Aguiar or Sawyer available for comment, as well as other employees who have kept a high profile on the competitive daily fantasy circuit. The company said it would not respond to detailed questions about its employees or policies while its internal investigation was underway.“Our objective is to be completely transparent with our findings, and we expect that we will be able to report on the results of that review in the next few weeks,” it said in a statement.Likewise, FanDuel said it would have no further comment on its employees or practices.Yet both companies have acknowledged that they recruited many of their employees from the pool of devoted daily fantasy sports enthusiasts and allowed them to play the games, in the kind of potential conflict of interest generally avoided in other industries that handle sensitive information.Last month at a conference at Babson College near Boston, a DraftKings founder, Paul Liberman, said barring employees from playing could make it difficult to retain talent.“We have some people who make significantly more money off of our competitors’ sites than they do working for DraftKings,” he said.In fact, Aguiar, a former professional poker player and an early star in daily fantasy sports, was brought into DraftKings to court top players in an effort to expand the high end of the business.To lure everyday players and stoke big hopes, the sites depend on these big-winning sharks, as the highly skilled and large-volume players are known. Part-time minnows and other low-volume enthusiasts who do not win much make up most of the rest of the field, similar to the situation at casinos.Advertisements for both companies feature 20-somethings near tears after winning life-changing bounties, but the fine print on the television ads states that winnings actually average $22.A recent study in Sports Business Daily found that over the first half of this year’s Major League Baseball season, 91 percent of daily fantasy sports player profits were won by just 1.3 percent of the players. In fact, on average, the top 11 players paid $2 million in entry fees and made profits of $135,000 each while accounting for 17 percent of all entry fees.Many of those players use automated processes that let them change hundreds, if not thousands, of lineups in seconds, a decided advantage when last-minute changes are made in the real lineups of professional football, basketball or baseball teams.“It’s a great recreational game, but financially it’s not a wise investment for people,” said Dan Singer, who leads the sports and gambling practice at the consulting giant McKinsey & Company and was an author of the Sports Business Daily study.Charting Top PlayersOn RotoGrinders, a site that closely follows the fantasy sports industry, the exploits of the top players — many of them employees of DraftKings or FanDuel — are charted, ranked and followed in fan-boy fashion. Neither company would say how much its employees had won, but Justine Sacco, a spokeswoman for FanDuel, said DraftKings employees had won less than $10 million in her company’s contests.There have also been complaints that some of the automated programs can exploit weaker players by identifying them and getting into competitions with them ahead of everyone else.DraftKings declined to discuss its policies on using automated processes, which are called scripting. FanDuel said that it had put some restrictions on the programs — including prohibiting last-minute automated lineup changes — but that it reviewed requests for them individually.Access to inside information by employees of the two companies has been questioned before in forums, in part because neither DraftKings nor FanDuel has given any details on what safeguards are in place to protect their data.Leonard Don Diego first worked at FanDuel but is now an engagement manager at DraftKings. A year ago, he was accused of sharing lineups, according to a RotoGrinders thread.Don Diego denied that he had passed on information.The recent scandal was ignited after Ethan Haskell, a DraftKings employee, admitted to releasing inside information.In promotional pictures for the site, he looks like those rapturous winners holding oversize checks in the company’s television commercials. He has a ball cap on backward and a loving-life grin that might appeal to the many young postcollege players who dominate the demographic that is powering daily fantasy sports’ growth.More than a week ago, Haskell admitted on a blog post that he had released “player owned percentages” — by mistake, he said — before all the lineups for the third week of N.F.L. games were locked up. The data showed which players — included in more than 400,000 entries — were most commonly selected in lineups submitted to the site’s Millionaire Maker contest.That week, he won $350,000 on the rival FanDuel site, but DraftKings said he had done so without benefit of inside information. He also won one of 120 seats at FanDuel’s $12 million World Fantasy Football Championship. There he will have the opportunity to win a $3 million first-place check, and he is guaranteed at least $20,000 for showing up, even if he finishes last.Haskell’s big win followed a hot streak in August, when he finished in the top 10 of 13 Major League Baseball contests, including one contest, with a $25 buy-in, in which he beat nearly 13,000 others to win $50,000, according to the website Larry Brown Sports.Cory Albertson, one of the most successful players in the short history of daily fantasy sports, said that he had long pushed both companies to develop a way to regulate themselves. He has a master’s degree in business administration from Notre Dame and invests more than $10 million annually in one-day fantasy sports. Even though daily fantasy sports operate under an exemption to the Unlawful Internet Gambling Enforcement Act of 2006, which outlawed online poker and sports betting, Albertson said that fantasy sites were a form of gambling and that he believed they should be regulated.“When there are no internal controls to keep your employees in check in terms of what they’re doing, it’s understandable that many of them would become preoccupied with trying to also just win money playing fantasy sports,” Albertson said. DraftKings and FanDuel are each valued at more than $1 billion and have begun incessant and costly television advertising campaigns to persuade viewers that anyone with an interest in sports can become a millionaire. The networks and sports leagues so far have been stalwart investors or willing partners in sponsorship agreements.Neither company, however, has turned a profit.It is unclear whether the scandal will slow the companies’ momentum. Last week, DraftKings and FanDuel both posted their first profitable Sundays of the season in their guaranteed prize games, giving out $39.8 million in winnings but taking in $43.6 million in entry fees, according to SuperLobby, an independent site tracking the industry’s guaranteed-prize games.“If you are going to purport you are a billion-dollar business, and advertise on billboards and televisions throughout the country, you need to act like a billion-dollar business,” said Marc Edelman, a law professor at Baruch College and Fordham University and an expert on fantasy sports. “And that includes, among other things, putting in place very sophisticated firewalls and controls to prevent these types of instances from happening in the first place.”Calling It QuitsCalvert, 29, had never thought of himself as a minnow, as part-time fantasy sports players are known. He was lured into daily fantasy six months ago and played more than 9,000 games in many sports, well enough to earn “V.I.P.” status at DraftKings. He said he had played mainly in tournaments with small buy-ins and once had a $9,000 weekend. Over all, however, Calvert said, he lost more than he won.On Sunday, for the first time in many weekends, he watched N.F.L. games simply as a spectator.“I’m done,” said Calvert, who is married and works in sales.By the measures of Singer’s study, Calvert was a big fish among the 5 percent of players who, on average, lost $1,100 on entry fees of $3,600. The true minnows account for 80 percent of the millions of daily players, and they lost, on average, $25 on entry fees of $49.“The minnows may lose $10 a month and will happily continue to play forever,” Singer said. “But the entire fantasy economy depends on keeping those few big fish.”After the insider trading allegations surfaced, Calvert emailed Jason Robins, DraftKings’ chief executive and a co-founder, with his complaints. Two days went by without a response.On Wednesday, he posted his story on Reddit.com. Twenty minutes later, the DraftKings co-founder Matt Kalish called him. On Friday, Robins, Kalish and Liberman — the founders — sent an email intended to mollify their customers, many of whom are concerned.“Please know how grateful we are for the passion and loyalty you have shown DraftKings throughout our history and especially over the past week,” it said. “You remain our greatest priority.”CHICAGO — The Chicago Cubs played nearly 100 full seasons at their cozy North Side home without a day like this. From Three Finger Brown to Hack Wilson, Phil Cavarretta to Ernie Banks, Ryne Sandberg to Sammy Sosa, they had never clinched a postseason series at Wrigley Field.That changed on Tuesday, when a band of upstarts slew their biggest rival and barged into the National League Championship Series. The Cubs used three home runs and eight pitchers to eliminate the St. Louis Cardinals, 6-4, in Game 4 of this division series.The Cardinals have won 11 championships, all since the Cubs’ last title in 1908. St. Louis won 100 games this regular season and had reached the N.L.C.S. in each of the last four years. For the Cubs’ president for baseball operations, Theo Epstein, who once built the Boston Red Sox, it felt familiar.“We beat the Cardinals — I mean, these are like older brothers who’ve been kicking sand in our face for 100 years,” Epstein said on the field, soaked from the wild clubhouse celebration. “There’s a lot of similarities to when we knocked off the Yankees in ’04. That one put us in the World Series. This one just gives us a nice date on Saturday.”The Cubs will travel to face the winner of the other division series between the Mets and the Los Angeles Dodgers. The Cubs have failed in their other three stops at this stage, in 1984, 1989 and 2003, and have not won a pennant since 1945.The 2003 loss — which followed a division-series clincher on the road — was excruciating: a fan’s busy hands, a shortstop’s error, a Marlins rally, another nightmare. Now, with young stars like Anthony Rizzo, Jorge Soler, Kris Bryant and Kyle Schwarber, the Cubs have another chance.“We’re going to celebrate this,” said Rizzo, who homered off Kevin Siegrist to break a 4-4 tie in the sixth inning. “We deserve to celebrate this. It’s been a long time coming for this city, and hopefully it’s just a sign of things to come.”Closer Hector Rondon sealed it in the ninth, striking out Stephen Piscotty and leaping for joy with catcher Miguel Montero. “Go Cubs Go!” rang from the loudspeakers, and 42,411 believers sang along, waving white towels with a blue “W,” like the win flag the Cubs fly above their scoreboard.Before the game, as Jason Hammel warmed up, it was a different song: Pearl Jam’s “Alive,” a classic by Eddie Vedder, a fan who has been a regular around the Cubs this month. They might as well have blasted the song from a boom box held aloft by John Cusack, the “Say Anything ...” star and another celebrity along for this October joy ride.The Cubs are a happening, and Montero created a simple catchphrase for T-shirts and social media: #wearegood. He said he wanted to make a painting of it.“I remember we lost a couple of games in a row, so you start reading your Twitter from the fans, and they’re like, ‘Oh, here it comes again,’ ” Montero said, adding later, “If we don’t believe that we are good, we’re not going to have a chance.”The Cubs were losing before the first out of Game 4, after a two-run homer by Piscotty. By the end of the next inning, though, they were ahead, in an unusual rally off John Lackey.With two on and one out in the second, Lackey faced Montero as Justin Grimm stirred in the Cubs’ bullpen. If Montero had reached to load the bases, Manager Joe Maddon said later, he would have used Tommy La Stella to pinch-hit. When Montero struck out, Grimm sat down and Hammel batted.Naturally, he singled to center to score the Cubs’ first run. On the very next pitch, Javier Baez lashed an opposite-field, three-run homer to the seats in right. Baez, 22, was playing for Addison Russell, the Cubs’ dynamic rookie shortstop, who hurt his hamstring racing for a triple in Game 3. These Cubs have young talent to spare.“My advice to him tonight was just to own the game,” Maddon said of Baez, “and he kind of did.”The Cardinals rallied for two runs off the Cubs’ bullpen in the sixth, but a strong throw from Soler in right that cut down Tony Cruz at the plate kept them from taking the lead. Then Rizzo struck in the sixth, and during a pitching change in the top of the seventh, Schwarber, the left fielder, told center fielder Dexter Fowler that he would go deep, too.“You hit it, and you run around the bases, and the place is going nuts,” Schwarber said. “That’s when it hits you, that this is what it’s all about. This is what you live to play baseball for.”Schwarber’s drive was majestic, soaring into the fading sky, landing atop the new video board down the right-field line. David Ross, the backup catcher, said most hitters could not even reach that in batting practice. Epstein quoted loosely from “Jaws.”“We’re going to have to build a bigger ballpark,” he said.The Cubs had been circling as Epstein overhauled them, and now they have struck, devouring Pittsburgh in the wild-card game before ravaging the Cardinals. As the Cubs’ owner, Tom Ricketts, surveyed the joyous stands from the field after the game, he had bigger plans.“We’re playing well, we’re playing loose, we’re playing focused at the right time,” Ricketts said. “And I think we’re going to keep moving.”TORONTO — Marcus Stroman was warming up vigorously for the Toronto Blue Jays in the visitors’ bullpen during Game 4 of their American League division series on Monday, and it was enough to make some wonder why.John Gibbons, Toronto’s manager, had made an unconventional decision to use David Price, the ace starting pitcher, in relief a few innings earlier against the Texas Rangers. Would he do the same with another starter, Stroman?Stroman, who missed most of the season with a torn anterior cruciate ligament, threw his final pitch, walked up to the bullpen catcher to give him a hug, placed a towel around his neck and sat down. He was not going to pitch Monday, after all. He was getting ready for something bigger.Stroman was throwing his side session, preparing to start Game 5 on Wednesday against Cole Hamels of the Rangers. The winning team will advance to the American League Championship Series.The honor did not just simply fall to Stroman, a brassy 24-year-old right-hander with the scintillating repertoire, whom the Blue Jays want on the mound for a decisive game and Gibbons called, “cocky,” as an attribute.“He’s got a great arm,” Gibbons said of Stroman. “He’s got great stuff, whatever you want to call it. But there’s something different about him, too, and I expect that if anyone can rise to the occasion, it would be him.”By using Price in relief, Gibbons had clearly decided on his Game 5 starter, signaling that the Blue Jays preferred Stroman, who has only 24 major league starts on his résumé, over Price, the 2012 American League Cy Young Award winner and a top candidate for this year’s award.The Blue Jays acquired Price just before the trade deadline because they lacked an ace. Stroman might have been an ace, but he was rehabilitating his knee injury at Duke University and working to get his bachelor’s degree.Price did very well for the Blue Jays so, naturally, was picked to start Game 1, with the implication that he would also start Game 5 on an extra day’s rest.But Gibbons and the Blue Jays apparently made plans to go with Stroman on regular rest in Game 5, a decision that may have been made shortly after Price lost Game 1.For as good as Price is, he has been terrible in the postseason. In six starts, he is 0-6 with a 5.23 earned run average. He did not pitch much better in relief on Monday but was awarded the win. It was his first win in the postseason since he won a game in relief in a 2008 division series as a rookie with the Tampa Bay Rays.Gibbons could have elected to use Stroman instead of Price in relief of Game 4, if he really needed one of his best pitchers to bridge the gap to the back end of the bullpen.By using Price when Toronto had a six-run lead, Gibbons eliminated the awkwardness of having both Price and Stroman available to start Game 5.Gibbons’s rationale after Game 4 made sense. He had just seen the Kansas City Royals overcome a four-run deficit in the eighth inning of their Game 4 against the Houston Astros, and go on to win. Gibbons said he believed it was wise to snuff out a comeback before it could start, which is why he called on Price.Price threw three innings, allowing three runs, and fired 50 pitches. After the game, Gibbons said Price would not pitch again in the series. Price said he would be ready if needed, and that forced Gibbons to back off slightly when he spoke to reporters on Tuesday.“David was very instrumental in getting us here, but he’s not here to be abused, either,” Gibbons said. “So we’ll see, but don’t count on it.”The hope for the Blue Jays is that no such emergency relief will be necessary. Stroman pitched well in Game 2, allowing three earned runs in seven innings in his postseason debut. The Rangers won that game in 14 innings.In the regular season, Stroman was 4-0 with a 1.67 earned run average after returning from his injury far earlier than anyone except him expected.Asked on Tuesday to gauge his excitement level on a scale from 1 to 10, the number he chose was not surprising.“I’m pretty excited,” Stroman said. “Probably say it’s around a 10 right now, and I can only imagine tomorrow. It’s going to be a lot of deep breaths out there on the mound, do everything I can just to keep my emotions in check while still being myself.”Stroman being himself is exactly what the Blue Jays want for Game 5.Sandra Spuzich, a golfer whose first professional victory was at the 1966 United States Women’s Open and who at 45 became the oldest player in the L.P.G.A. to win two tournaments in one season — a record that stands — died on Oct. 6 at her home in Indianapolis. She was 78.The cause was leukemia, said her partner, the former golfer Joyce Kazmierski.A promising amateur, Spuzich struggled after joining the tour in 1962. Over the next four years, she competed in more than 100 tournaments without winning one. MacGregor Golf, her corporate sponsor, dropped her midway through the 1966 season.“I was beginning to think I’d never win anything,” she told The New York Times later that year.That July, she beat Carol Mann by one stroke and Mickey Wright by two to win the United States Women’s Open, the Ladies Professional Golf Association’s most prestigious tournament, with an aggregate score of 297 at the Hazeltine National Golf Club course in Chaska, Minn.“I was in the basement too long,” Spuzich told Time magazine that year. “It’s nice to get upstairs and see how the other half lives.”Spuzich won six more tournaments, including the Corning Classic and the Mary Kay Golf Classic in 1982, when she was 45. She left competitive play in the 1990s.Sandra Ann Spuzich was born in Indianapolis on April 3, 1937. She graduated from what is now George Washington Community High School and received a bachelor’s degree from Indiana University, then worked as a physical education teacher before joining the pro tour.Spuzich (pronounced SPOOZ-itch) met Kazmierski on the tour. Kazmierski said they had been together for 42 years. She is also survived by a sister, Mary Lou Spaulding.Spuzich had a knack for hitting holes in one, especially at the Lady Keystone Open, an event she won by one stroke in 1977. She made three, on three different par-3 holes, during three Opens at the Hershey Country Club in Pennsylvania.Second-seeded Roger Federer lost, 7-6 (4), 2-6, 6-3, to the Spanish qualifier Albert Ramos-Vinolas in his opening match at the Shanghai Masters.Lamar Odom, the former N.B.A. forward who became a reality TV star after marrying a Kardashian, was hospitalized after he was found unconscious in a Nevada brothel on Tuesday evening.Odom, 35, had been staying at the Love Ranch in Crystal, Nev., since Saturday. He was found lying facedown by two women who went to check on him Tuesday afternoon, Dennis Hof, the brothel’s owner, told The Associated Press.“He just wanted to get away, have a good time and relax,” Hof said, adding that Odom was “throwing up all kinds of stuff” when the brothel’s staff members tried to turn him on his side. Hof said that Odom had been taking an herbal sexual stimulant, but that he did not know if Odom had been taking anything else.Officials were able to stabilize Odom at a nearby hospital, but they were unable to fit his 6-foot-10 frame into a helicopter for further treatment. Instead, he was driven by ambulance to Sunrise Hospital and Medical Center in Las Vegas, according to a statement from the Nye County Sheriff’s Office.The website TMZ, which was among the first outlets to share news of Odom’s hospitalization, reported that his former wife, Khloe Kardashian, was at the hospital with him.The couple married in 2009. They separated in 2013, and their divorce was finalized in July. But since Odom has been associated with the Kardashian name, his every move has been well documented, both in Kardashian-related projects and under the paparazzi’s glare. The couple chose to put their relationship in front of the cameras on “Keeping Up With the Kardashians” and, eventually, with a spinoff show, “Khloe and Lamar.” Other licensing deals, like a fragrance, followed.In an interview with Complex magazine this summer, Kardashian said that the two remained on good terms.“When you genuinely feel like that was the right relationship,” she said, “you’re supposed to give it all you can.”Odom, who won two N.B.A. championships during a succesful seven-year stretch with the Los Angeles Lakers, has struggled with drug addiction since the couple’s separation. In 2013, he was pulled over for drunken driving in Los Angeles, and he later checked into a treatment center for drug and alcohol addiction.Odom, a Queens, N.Y., native, played high school basketball for Christ the King in Middle Village, and then for a prep school in Florida, where he was considered one of the best players in the country.He had initially planned to attend the University of Nevada, Las Vegas. But after questions arose about his test scores, the school dropped him. Later that year, he was arrested in a prostitution police sting operation in Las Vegas. He wound up playing one year at the University of Rhode Island.Soon after he was chosen as the fourth overall pick in the 1999 draft by the Los Angeles Clippers, his publicized battle with drugs began: In 2001, he was suspended from playing after he was found to have violated the N.B.A.’s drug policies.“It’s something that can’t happen again,” Odom said at the time. “Hopefully, now I can put it behind me and start to better myself.”His performance fell sharply in his final two seasons, one with the Mavericks and another with the Clippers. After a brief stint with a team in Spain and with the Knicks, his career was over in 2014 at age 34.Excel Sports Management, the company representing Odom, released a statement on Wednesday, saying, “We are staying close to the situation but have no additional information or comment at this time.”